&gt;I need to print up a pamphlet of facts that can disconnect people from their trust of government. As a very wise, successful union organizer named Al Evanoff taught me, when I had a similar impulse, "Paper doesn't organize people. People organize people." It turned out to be some of the best advice I ever heard. Believe it: NOTHING takes the place of face-to-face organizing. There are no shortcuts. But when long-term, serous organizing works right, each one you reach in turn reaches another, and so on and so on.  Is there any better time to start than now?
its the adrenalin, can you imagine the excitement there, well i cant but looks interesting :) 
Statistically, 51% of you voted for him.
"Savage" may only imply inferiority from certain frames of reference.  "Savage" is often used as a compliment.  "Violent", "oppressive", and "gender-biased" are equally loaded terms depending on your reference point.
PHP is still huge. It has a lot of flaws, but it's easy to learn, easy to host, and very popular. 
I don't see why joonix is getting downmodded. He isn't saying anything biased or disagreeable, only questioning GP's complete lack of sources for their assumptions.
strokes of a pen
That is obviously a duck.
Cold hard embrace? Is that like a point of pride or something? There's much colder, harder embraces, for much more money, in the legal profession.
Bread and circuses.
the fuckers.
No idea. It's been their for a while. Maybe the ranking program is hard coded that way??
Yes, the point of it having absolutely no fucking point.  At least the USB humping dog is funny for 3 seconds.
I know I'm just responding to myself over and over again, but I keep thinking of new points. The questioning during the Dem bullshit about Wright and other such nonsense has mostly been about "how does this fucking retarded shit hurt obama's electability" once he is the nominee - what are they going to ask him? How does this stuff effect his ability to be president? It clearly doesnt have ANYTHING to do with him being president. So... Where's the question? I think some of us are over-reacting. It's going to be all good.
Shit, I was going to name my kid Memristor, now I guess I need a new name.
Wow, actually that was a lot of downmodding...must be the Jewish Lobby! Ha!
Its cliche to write LOL, but I really did laugh out load after reading this comment.
people in denial. 
I probably would have been relieved at the misleading title, to be honest.
There is no tradition of protest in our country.  Those who do are labeled as crazy nuts.
[Fortress](http://projectfortress.sun.com/Projects/Community)
I believe these are referred to as [Via Ferrata](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Via_Ferrata). [Petzl](http://en.petzl.com/petzl/SportFamille?Famille=9#SousFamille2) makes gear specifically for these kinds of routes.
&gt;they have some seriously funny comments  this definitely aint it but [this](http://digg.com/educational/How_to_Use_Toilet_Paper?t=13862286) and its [precursor](http://digg.com/politics/Sheryl_Crow_Suggests_Limiting_Americans_Use_To_One_Square_Per_Sitting?t=6299672#c6307709) on the other hand are
that requires 1 brain more than these people have...
It would be useful data.
No tickee, no kiddee. No exceptions. Back to work, you little crumb snatcher!
Why bother? If you're using WPA, then it doesn't matter if you do MAC filtering or not, it adds nothing. All it does is make it more inconvenient every time you want to add an (authorised) device to the network. Anyone who can crack WPA can get your MAC address, and anyone who can't get your MAC address hasn't got a hope in hell of cracking WPA.
Actually I think the reason asynchronous CPUs aren't as widespread is because they're harder to design.
You can't have it both ways. It's collective sympathy or individual responsibility. Why a simple inference has to be muddled by unrelated qualifiers each and every time?  Have some respect for pure logic. Otherwise you'll end up with fuzzy logic of talmud.
yeah, there is not "some kind of point", like your karma dude. i'm at office and i just registered to reply you, you just made my day.
I once rode in a cab with an Afghani cab driver. He had plenty of things to say about America "bringing democracy" to his country. One quote stood out to me that I will paraphrase to the best of my ability: "Bringing Democracy to Afghani people is like giving ice cream to monkeys. They don't know what to do with it. It's a foreign concept. Democracy is not something you can introduce. It's something that must be nourished for generations before it takes root."
I bet he could get you into the sack with him.  The man's persuasive.
I really wish that was the case, but it just doesn't seem like that to me at all. I have problems with some decisions of the Israeli gov't as well but really, it seems like a lot of old-fashioned Jew-bashing.
There's not much left of a plane when it slams into a giant building at hundreds of miles per hour, but there are plenty of pictures around that show obvious plane parts.
Yeah, I feel that way myself about these "depressing" stories too. It feels like I can't really do much about it, so why bother talking about it. Or, why bother reading these stories at all...  It's an interesting phenomenon of hopelessness that should get fixed, so we don't go invading more countries leaving tens of thousands of civilians dead. Something needs to be done to fix this.
I want to share a photograph of another one of my lovely companion parrots with you. 
We have rail between Auckland and Wellington here (500Km-ish). It takes all day to get there so nobody uses it, everybody flies as it's only an hour by plane (security takes ten minutes, you just have to be there half an hour before takeoff) so you can just pop up and back in a day.  They actually tried to shut the train down a year or two ago, but all the people who never used it started screaming about losing it.
I see that we all agree (1) that he didn't write any of those racist screeds that filled his newsletter over the years, but (2) there is no possibility that this particular book is ghostwritten. Swell.
Do either of you smoke?
No, but it's not really the same thing, now is it?
[Here you go](http://www.credit.com/credit_information/credit_help/The-Top-10-Credit-Mistakes.jsp)
&gt;As a fan, he said, he felt the film was “horrible to watch,” as he thinks the man appears to be on drugs or heavily intoxicated. “I don’t want that to be what I think about when I think about Jimi Hendrix,” he said.  Uh, looks like someone missed a lot of what the 60's were about...
You are going to need some serious fire power to coup d'etat with single digit support. Or I mean, the media, damn them.
You could sell it to someone who has absolutely no knowledge about computers...if one were so inclined.
It's always a good idea to refrain from commenting on something you know nothing about. You should have done it here. But I'll try to address your "point". It's inflation, asshole. It's eating us alive. The only people the rate cuts have helped is the investment banks who are using that easy money to bid up commodities to record levels. K? Now go back to American Idol.
And why do you think that is? Could it be the lack of software support?
Thank you. I am so sick of all the forwards of McSweeney's stuff from friends who really should know better -- and these people are *reporters*! Is somebody actually requiring college students to read this crap? 
And just where exactly do you think you are?
Yes, I never even realized the diff until I went to the Caribbean and had one.  Even the cigarettes tasted better - I was told they used the local island tobacco for the Marlboros after I had asked if they were really Marlboros.
Where do they get off not having Wrigley in the top 5...
Well that's an obvious one, if you spend more time in the kitchen,your going to eat more food.
Given your name, there is something very disturbing about this singing.
Let's say he really got the money somehow -- then he wants to use it to start a *record company*? 
The media is spinning against Ron Paul, as usual. It's not a take over when you've been voted in; it's a take over when you appoint a person who wasn't voted in.  Ron Paul got the votes, and now he should get the delegates.
If you look at the Amazon Movers and Shakers section, you will find that Ron Paul's book is #9.  http://www.amazon.com/gp/movers-and-shakers/books/ref=pd_ts_b_mte#learnmore
There is no chance at all 9/11 was an inside job.  This administration is not capable of such a clever, thought-out, well disguised plan.  They couldn't even keep a couple of pentagon-planted military analysts secret, or the firing of a few attorneys.
Yes, because this isn't one of the most futile legal battles ever.
FTA: ""Just to make things clear, we are not stating that anthropogenic [man-made] climate change won't be as bad as previously thought," said Mojib Latif, a professor at the Leibniz Institute of Marine Sciences in Kiel, northern Germany."  .  Translation - keep the grant money coming.
Perhaps you have trouble distinguishing The difference. And perhaps redditors do as well.
Angry much? Why don't you point me to three paleoclimatologists who disagree with the IPCC consensus? How about Dr. Andrew Weaver, lead IPCC author and scientist at the University of Victoria in my home town; he's got a few publications to his name: http://climate.uvic.ca/people/weaver/weaver-publications.html So you write off all Greens because some support Dr. Pianka (who I had to Google to find, and who has never been mentioned to me by Green candidates, supporters, or any post I've read on the Green Party of Canada blog)? That's handy for you.  Here's my seat-of-the-pants definition of sustainably: Something that can be done indefinitely, because it contributes to people, planet, or prosperity.
Just imagine for a second that she was the only one to have a camera. Then we wouldn't see this footage, this would never be brought to light and she would be charged with 2 felonies and 2 misdemeanors. No one would be the wiser while she was rotting in jail.  This would most likely be the situation any place other then NYC, where hundreds of people aren't packing cameras and aiming them at the pigs. Most other cities you would be lucky to get 2 people with cameras at a particular incident who would be much easier subdued. Plus the footage doesn't exist if the cameras get smashed or deleted.
Actually the death toll would be closer to one and a half million people.
Yes, he had simply paid the wrong state.  Lots of entertainers (and other people) travel, move around and work in many states.  So this post appears to have been another example of the well organized right-wing sleaze, slander and smear machine!  We've got to fight back harder than ever.  Don't let McCain/McBush take back the White House!  Plus... Al Franken, author of "Rush Limbaugh Is A Big Fat Idiot" is effin' hilarious!!!
But on the flip side, if you get passionate people talking about this kinda thing, it's easy to dismiss them as "conspiracy theorists." And this judgement is somewhat justified - since the reasons behind this probably isn't some sinister plan, but just simple social phenomenon.  I think our best bet is for some sociologists and anthropologists to study this, understand it, and then propose ways to change our course in a non-accusatory way.
Why should it be? That you and I should get along so awfully.... doo doo DOO
I don't own, nor would I buy, one of those.
All weekend?!  It's about time to submit it to The Smithsonian for archiving!  Wow, to be three days younger again.
He said "...we're more popular than Jesus NOW". "Now" was not 2004 and later.
Forget Paris, check out [Harry Potter](http://www.google.com/trends?q=harry+potter%2C+jesus&amp;ctab=0&amp;geo=all&amp;date=all&amp;sort=0).
My understanding is that the Fed prefers any level of inflation to any level of deflation. The actions taken today are in line with creating inflation with the hope of counter-acting the looming deflationary threat.
What stimulus check?  Oh, you mean the welfare check...
A simple search for stretch. I needed an image of an athlete stretching to add to a newsletter.
looks more like an iTablet to me
&gt;New York dollars versus Kansas City dollars  Excellent point. You can imagine how embarrassed I was the last time I flew into Kansas City and forgot to get them exchanged. Boy was there egg on my face!
elite?
It's funny you said that... "A heartbreaking work of staggering genius" by Dave Eggers, the founder of McSweeney's, was required reading for me in college. 
My machine can only address nibbles, you insensitive clod?
It's never a bad month for sex.
That says "warmest".
Ah, another bird person.  Do you let your birds shit on top of your head like the rest of the bird people?
Why just yours? What makes you think yer so damned special?!
I'm trying to prove that:  &gt; Your body produces DMT when you're about to die naturally.  and  &gt; It's produced by your pineal gland as your born, in near-death experiences, sleep, and when you die. It seems to be related to stress. Hence why people that almost die see "white lights" and people that are sleeping think they get abducted by aliens and stuff.  Is an amusing idea and, at this point in time, nothing more. It's not fact, as you made it out to be. The purpose of DMT in our bodies is not yet known.
I've never cut my dinner steak with a sword... might be interesting though.
Standard Shipping was only $3.99 for me (to HI no less), might be worth not buying something else. But here are a few suggestions anyway: [Fooled by Randomness: The Hidden Role of Chance in Life and in the Markets by Nassim Nicholas Taleb (Paperback - Aug 23, 2005)](http://www.amazon.com/Fooled-Randomness-Hidden-Chance-Markets/dp/0812975219/ref=pd_bxgy_b_text_b) [The Black Swan: The Impact of the Highly Improbable (Hardcover) by Nassim Nicholas Taleb (Author)](http://www.amazon.com/Black-Swan-Impact-Highly-Improbable/dp/1400063515/ref=pd_bbs_2?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books&amp;qid=1209600177&amp;sr=8-2) I ordered these recently too, but haven't received them yet.  The idea of shifting the entire tax burden from production, saving, and investment to consumption intrigues me: [The FairTax Book by Neal Boortz and John Linder (Hardcover - Aug 2, 2005)](http://www.amazon.com/FairTax-Book-Neal-Boortz/dp/0060875410/ref=pd_bbs_2?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books&amp;qid=1209600286&amp;sr=1-2) [FairTax: The Truth: Answering the Critics by Neal Boortz and John Linder (Paperback - Feb 12, 2008)](http://www.amazon.com/FairTax-Answering-Critics-Neal-Boortz/dp/0061540463/ref=pd_bbs_sr_1?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books&amp;qid=1209600286&amp;sr=1-1)
Ahhh...as a former HP insider, I can say that now that a new engineering marvel has been discovered on the HP tree, the race will be on internally to stifle it or sell it to someone else to make gobs of money off of.  The fact that anything innovative has come out of that hellhole after all the cuts to engineering and research is, quite frankly, amazing.  
Rewards. I carry four cards:  * one that gives 5% cash back on restaurants/movies/bookstores * one that gives 5% on gas/groceries/drugstore purchases * one that gives 5% on certain purchases categories that change quarterly * one that gives 2% on everything (which I use for purchases that don't fall into any of the above categories).  If I found a card that could do all of that, I would gladly consolidate down to one card.  Edit: another reason to have multiple cards is that they all have different features. Some give you better travel/rental car insurance. Some charge smaller fees for foreign transactions. Some are very consumer-friendly when it comes to disputing which comes in handy with online purchases from sketchy sellers.
so he gets downmodded for being correct? 
Not all biofuels are bad.  Corn based ethanol's pretty fucked up, though.  The conversion rate's something crazy like a tank's worth of corn ethanol could feed a family for a year.  So that's pretty evil.
Please provide a context for which killing your wife for going to the bazaar without your permission is not barbaric. Otherwise, shut the fuck up.
That's an assumption without fact.  I can just as easily assume that only Ron Paul diehard fans bought the book. Of course they would rate it highly.   Just the same way they gamed online polls.
Some comments... I don't agree with the implied idea behind the article. I'm not even a fan of Ubuntu *at all*.  &gt;Canonical makes no secret of the fact that it is eager to sell Ubuntu support contracts to enterprise users. 24x7 support on Ubuntu Server will cost you $2,750 per year, or $750 for 9x5. That's basically the Red Hat business model (with free binaries thrown in), and is perfectly uncontroversial, though surprisingly expensive.   If it's uncontroversial - which it is - why even mention it constantly throughout the article as some sort of sin? Redhat's business model is IMO one of the best out there, managing to conciliate both the free software community interests and the natural commercial interests of Redhat and their clients.  &gt;Lately however Canonical has introduced a new twist into the Ubuntu business model with the launch of its Landscape systems management and monitoring tool. Basically Landscape is very similar to Red Hat Network. It allows you to track the configurations and status of all your Ubuntu desktops and servers, and to install updates under central control (though with full customization options).  Sounds great. Also sounds like a service, and not software, so I don't know what is surprising or odd about it.  &gt;And the catch is? This is completely proprietary code. It's not GPL'd, you can't see the source, and you can't get it for free. In fact, you can't even have the binary, because Landscape is provided as an online service only. Here I'm a bit split: as I said above Canonical hs *every right* to charge for the online service (just like Redhat or SuSE do).  They also have the right to keep the server component of Landscape closed, although in here I do think that it is a bit contradictory with their general position. They could provide perhaps the code, while retaining the service. Not a biggie though.  &gt;Only the Landscape client is free and open source, which it has to be of course because it cohabits physically with the kernel on each of your Ubuntu machines.  Well, true, but we do no know if Canonical did it solely because they were "forced": actually from that description I don't see a reason why they *had* to, since mere cohabitation doesn't trigger the GPL: there are plenty of closed-source applications of he genre.  &gt;With Landscape Canonical has effectively abolished the distinction between its business model and Red Hat's, at least as far as enterprise customers are concerned  Again, I do not understand why this is "bad": Redhat is many times very unjustly put aside, when it fact it is responsible for many, many  advances in free software in general, and as a company it has a quite coherent attitude in the defense of free software; I think that Debian and Redhat are the two main distribution strongholds of the free software perspective in the GNU/Linux world, as opposed to the ones that would closed it bit by bit in the name of "convenience" and "just works".  &gt;But no matter. Canonical and Ubuntu have the right to choose whatever business model they please.  Again, yes they do, and I don't understand why this business model is "wrong", even in purely "free software" cred terms.   &gt;What's comical though is the blatant, almost Orwellian contradiction between their hard-nosed desire to make money and the grandiose Ubuntu philosophy.   Why? WHY? FREE SOFTWARE DOESN'T MEAN GRATIS SOFTWARE FFS! The FSF earned money since the very beginning **selling** their GPLed software - including in Entreprise editions were every GNU package would be compiled to a target platform and provided on tape.   There is no contradiction between making money and defending free software: actually, doing both is an extra bonus in terms of showing the viability of such projects.
Knives are more discreet than swords.
But do you like blog-eggs &amp; spam?
MILF?
"This is not an issue the international community needs to address."  It is if the U.S. keeps using it as pre-text to  blow the fuck out of the middle east.
Your head is in a dark place, ....wet! and that smell?
How droll.
Of course it's Rove, Cheney, Bush and the rest of that mob who should be in prison. Don Siegelman deserves, at the least, the Presidential Medal of Freedom.  
"Cause swords are for French pussies and the Chinese." Would be a logical assumption.
Too bad intelligence isn't proportional to your voting power.
Many times I am doing local development that I don't want to commit to a the main (central) repository... (work in progress, call it.) However, I'd still like some local change tracking, and the ability to push up my final set of changes when complete.   Git seems perfect for that.
mutations? Just what we need. Terrorists with superpowers.
You know I've tried linux and I didn't like it all that much, but it's probably just because I'm so used to XP.  My next computer, though, i'll probably try Linux again.
haha, this is win.
He seems to be solidifying his lead in delegates but weakening overall.  I am really worried. It's looking like a damaged Obama will end up running against McCain.  I really don't want to see a President McCain.
[By the Time NBER Announces A Recession, It's Over](http://mjperry.blogspot.com/2008/01/when-nber-announces-recession-itll-be.html)
yeah i agree. reasonable is not a trait of many dictators, or at least not a public trait.
More evidence that rap causes brain damage.
or a robot.
I think the most important part of this discovery is the removal of the Hard Disk &lt;-&gt; RAM separation.  I remember, a long time ago, using a small program that would load Windows 95 completely into RAM before running it. Then, when it ran, it was stupid fast.  If everything we store could be of that speed... _everything_, potentially "already loaded into RAM" because it is the RAM... the ramifications for computers in general are incalculable.  Just imagine how it would change programming.  Suddenly, your memory is your hard drive.  File reads/writes need not be avoided at all.  Everything becomes nearly instant.  The hard drive, which has **always** been the biggest bottleneck of a computer system, will disappear.  Amazing.
It's actually an 802.11g wireless usb adapter. Look at the brand, D-Link, who does not make flash drives and the model numuber confirms it.
Jesus speak *American*, buddy.  Maybe then I'll read your blog.  
It's their careers which are causing the PTSD and major depression.  When I get more established and start a business after these wars are over, I'd be much more likely to look to hire ex-soldiers who realized the shit was wrong than the ex-soldiers who were gung ho about mowing people down.  If war doesn't fuck you up at least a little bit, it means you are probably a sociopath, not that you are weak.
As the "t" in "warmest" match the other "t's" on the same photo, no it isn't.  The "s" in "warmest" also matches the "s" in "regards".  So, no. Not even remotely debatable.
That's what I thought.
The fed is out to get you, your dollars are going to be worth nothing, big bankers are the real ones profiting, we're invading Iran tomorrow, 9-11 was an inside job, etc etc.
&gt; Raising the price of gasoline without a coincident rise in worldwide crude oil is a clear indication of price manipulation an collusion   It happens all the time.  It isn't the cost of crude oil that causes gas prices rise in the summer and on long weekends.
I'm in the Green Party of Canada. I don't know about the US GP. I didn't say we were right or left - I said we wanted things to be sustainable.  You're being silly, and making yourself look foolish in the process. Do you really think I mean "tax the oceans?" Do you? Come on. I mean tax human-caused carbon emissions, and it's something we need to do. CEOs of many major companies are calling for a carbon tax.  How do you propose we determine what is pollution? After many people get sick and die in an area, the remaining people hire private scientists (because in your world there are no public scientists) and sue? 
Jesus told me you're lying.
&gt; The constitution is a contract and can only be changed by a constitutional amendment.  The Constitution is and always has been open to interpretation.  &gt; The Constitution gives Congress the authority to establish armies. The Air Force was initially part of the Army. The fact that it is now a separate branch is an organizational detail.  So was the National Institutes of Health.  So was NASA.  The NSF played a huge part in national defense at its creation and was one of the reasons for its creation.  The CDC predecessor was responsible for keeping malaria and typhus out of war areas during WWII and is currently responsible for bioterrorism defense.  The predecessor of NOAA was formed as a survey agency under Jefferson.  The Department of Defense...well...it's the freakin' Department of Defense.  Why don't you consider these to be "organizational details" as well?    &gt; Which are created and controlled by politicians. Congress is the only government body that has authority over federal spending.  It's apparent that you really don't know what you're talking about.  Congress has the authority to authorize federal spending.  Congress is not involved in the dispersement of said funds.  Study sections are not created or controlled by Congress.  Agencies themselves assign who sits on study sections, not Congress. http://cms.csr.nih.gov/PeerReviewMeetings/StudySectionReviewers/HowScientistsareSelected+orStudySectionService.htm  Read up and try to educate yourself...just a little.  &gt; At least until some politicians decide otherwise. But you shouldn't have a problem with that since you think politicians should be deciding what science is worthy of taxpayer money.  Strawman.  Weak one at that.  Scientists decide what does and doesn't get funded.  I've pointed this out to you twice.  I don't know how I can say it any simpler.  I can't dumb it down any further.   &gt; The US is a constitutional republic. The people don't make public policy. If the people want something changed that's what the amendment process is for. The constitution wasn't intended to be changed on a whim. Otherwise it becomes meaningless.  The people elect representatives who implement policies.  The voice of the people extends far beyond your belief that the only way they can control government is through changes to the Constitution.  &gt; You've made a lot of emotional arguments but have said nothing about how the constitution grants the federal government the power to fund scientific research.  I've given you two reasons in my first post to you.  One: providing for the general welfare.  Two: defense, given that many of the scientific agencies are offshoots of the military branches. &gt; And you've just lost all credibility. This conversation is over.  What?  When you can't hang with an argument you take your ball and go home?  I'm sorry, but your viewpoints are out of sync with modern day interpretation of both government and the constitution.  Your opinions are also out of sync with the general population and the people, who support federal funding of the sciences.  The only people who actually advocate your malformed viewpoint are the extremist new media. Feel free to take me up on my offer of me paying your federal taxes that go toward scientific funding in exchange for you giving up all access to government sciences' developments.  If it shuts you up, I'm willing to shell out the $5 you contribute annually.  
That splitting hairs, I think.  A bigot is a bigot.
A little experimenting goes a long way. You will find that if you copy and paste some of the article into a Reddit comment, all of the lowercase letters appear in the proper places.
&gt; While the effect remains small, it is at least now present.  I have to yield this point to you. I wonder, though, which is greater; the small effect of these new superminority (is this a term?) stock owners, or the small effect of third parties in nudging change out of the two-party duopoly...
The risks you list pale in comparison with the biggest risk of all, which is an attacker having full access to your shared files (and, as we know, users share entire drives read/write since it's convenient).   So you're basically sharing all your data with the world.
What is your point?
It was breakfast.
After he leaves office, Bush should be arrested and tried.
I did imply, because it is the case. Fallon refused to send another carrier to the gulf. when you use quotes, try to quote someone.  also try reading the article, you will seem more imformed.  btw, nice how you still have zero proof on that third carrier. keep lookin.
I've had a couple XP infections similar to what you're describing - usually I can kill them with a combination of [AVG Free](http://free.grisoft.com/ww.download-avg-anti-virus-free-edition) and [Spybot Search and Destroy](http://www.safer-networking.org/en/index.html).  Of course,   nothing beats a clean install followed by thorough updating and patching.  If you've got the time, that is.  
yeah, that was pretty awful.
It's all relative. In the U.S., someone might say, "If my wife sleeps with another man, I will kill her." If you think that's different and justified, now I'm in your position thinking this guy is barbaric and uncivilized.  There are many different cultures and the way people think vary greatly, it's not helpful in any way to just say "they're crazy" because we don't understand.
This is some kind of lame koan. I can tell.
The analogy worked up until the last sentence.
It's True. I went to the pre-screening here in Las Vegas (Thanks to X 107.5).To be quite honest the movie could be best described as a "Robogasm"
People who bought this also bought:  Jesse Ventura  - Don't start the revolution without me!  lol
your posts have become tiresome to read and your comments lack the edge you think they have. i'm going to get a glass of milk now.
First flight I ever took was in one of these.   http://www.kjevik.dk/oddv/ViscountBMA.jpg  Banging across the English Channel at 7,000 feet, right through the cloud layer. I've had smoother rides on a galloping camel.
I'm not listening.....  I just need to close eyes and think happy thoughts.  When I open my eyes, I'll ignore everything I don't like and create my own world.
You forgot step 2.5:   Actually **use** WPA.
Starting out the article with a cartoon from a paranoid conspiracy theorist, and then using weasel words to describe Ron Paul's 18th Century dream for health care as "health freedom" makes me doubt the credibility of the author.
Wrong as in incorrect, untrue, false, fallacious. Not wrong as in morally wrong. 
Celebrity news!  I care?  
Clojure
Just after noon today I saw a segment on MSNBC in which The Hill's A.B. Stoddard was interviewed about Reverend Wright.  She was appalling.  As has been previously reported on The Daily Banter, she is a  hack .  Her palpably false indignation about the nature of Wright's comments over the last few days was the archetypal example for all of the punditocracy to follow.
This is an old topic. Paul never wrote those letters. They were published under  his newsletter by another individual and he's not the chief editor for them. But on top of that, the letters themselves had shallow racist remarks that were blown out of proportion by the media.  I don't know how much they cost at that time, but I'd imagine those newsletters didn't make "lots of money" as most newsletters and other publications to this day make enough to cover the cost of print and production.  You can tell how dense someone is by buying into or taking that kind of crap seriously (for example, view mschy's post below). Paul has no smut on him.
The foster parent don't deserve it but the social workers and judges who did that maybe.   However because I hate violence I would ratter fantasize about a complicated plan aiming at:   * Destroying their finances and credit. * Planting false evidences that would get them convicted of various crimes. * Regularly sabotage their daily life (car, house plumbing etc) * Get bogus highly publicize (fake) pedophilia accusations against them.  That could quench my thirst for vengeance.  However in the end I would probably only focus on just getting my kid back.
Really you are retarded to argue this.
Here's a pic from earlier today that one of my friend's took:  http://i26.tinypic.com/f5241z.jpg  It's supposed to get worse overnight. People, businesses, schools, etc. are moving everything out of their basements.
Mainly I understand there's no way to get past radiation, as well as gravity - our bodies are not really meant for long term space travel. We'd need to duplicate earth like atmosphere/gravity and block all the harmful radiation before it would be possible for long term human survival in space.
I do not like blog-eggs and spam, for a real reddit user I am.  I do not like them with star wars, jedi and stuff, without content to add to that silly cream fluff.
What's your point?  Trac isn't written in Django.
seconded.
Gamed isn't really accurate either. It just so happened that a shitload of people on the Internet, with the ability to utilize tools like meetup and phpBB liked Ron Paul. The rest was inevitable.
Stylus = Samsung iPhone-Killer's Killer.  And its interface is ugly.
"23nd" and "24rd" Let's hope the code is less buggy... &lt;/flame&gt;
Microsoft should go hostile, buy about ~20% shares of Yahoo on the open market... then back away, watch the share price tumble to $10 and snap up Yahoo at a discount ;-)
fUcK!
No of course not.
Hail Xenu!
You are right, but there is actual evidence for this stuff.  Look up architects and engineers for 9/11 truth.  They don't deal in speculation, just straight up science.
For me it was both, but I had to squint to make sure that wasn't Bub doing a table dance in the lowest level.
Nope, and nope. Keep trying, though, one of your prejudices *has* to be correct!
This is why I hate religion.
An awesome stunt done by a chinese man.
Stepping down should not absolve her of any wrongdoing....  Just saying
No, that's correct.  Spanish Homer just rolls his "r"s more than English Homer, so Google Translate is trying to compensate.
It ISN'T the case.   http://thinkprogress.org/2007/05/16/fallon-carrier/  "[Fallon] expressed strong opposition in February [2007] to an administration plan to increase the number of carrier strike groups in the Persian Gulf from TWO to THREE and vowed privately there would be no war against Iran as long as he was chief of CENTCOM."
Will someone PLEASE think of the childr...oh shit.
duh, take some of their shit too. what kind of military leader are you?!?
Gee, never thought of that. Thanks.
Unless it was inherited.
Because those who make decisions have an limitless desire for more money and there is an abundant supply of sheep out there.   Corporations offer the politicians what they want at the expense of that which they could care less about.  Wake up and smell the fascism!!!
The puppet project integrates git with trac. I think trac-hacks.org has something for it.
USSR didn't enjoy having all of their Afghanistan veterans back home either.
So then I don't have to wear a flag pin, right?
Oh shit.  I feel a big ol' batch of Cheesiness coming on! *Beauty is in the eye of the beholder.  Creativity is in the heart.*  
The Beatles win by a landslide in Japan. 
There's a huge amount of sprawl, it looks like to me. Only 20% of the urban area is actually in the city limits. You guys need downtown revitalization - it sounds like there were abortive plans for light rail?
&gt;Yes, a security professional can snoop a valid Mac address and spoof it to break into your network, but what's the chance that your neighbor can?  If I'm your neighbor, 100%.  In fact, I've brute-forced a WEP access point before, in a situation where my Internet connection was more than a week away from being installed, and all of my neighbors had either WEP or WPA.  Also, if I were seriously into trafficking illegal materials, like kiddie porn, you can be damn sure that I'd be doing it through the neighbor's wireless connection.  &gt;Hiding your SSID and locking down the WAP to your known Mac addresses is a good thing.  It's definitely a good thing, but the only people it keeps out are the ones who don't know enough to cause any damage in the first place.
A vote for Paul is a vote for Paul.  It could also be called a vote *against* both 2 party candidates, but not a vote *for* either of them. Since if not Paul it could have been cast for any number of other people, or not cast at all.
In my neighborhood there are a lot of unsecured wireless networks, and sometimes during the day you will see police come in and park just to leech off the wifi for a minute or two.
Which means, sadly, that you ARE a quarter-wit.
This is great. It demonstrates that climatologist really don't know what the fuck they are doing.  Their method of validating their computer models reminds me of Wall Street analysts that make up algorithms and check them against history. We call that curve fitting and it is as effective as using those signs above the roulette table to predict if red or black is coming up next. 
My SCIENCE that's creepy.
I wonder where that fish did go?
Buggy whips are coming back in a huge way!
This involves practicing of course?  I've taken to setting goals, like writing a poem by using a particular rhyming scheme or writing about a particular subject. Does that make sense? Or is that too forced?
Holy shit...much better, unpaid and faster.
That's just what Hitler said.
I guess, unless Paul gets enough to have a viable voting bloc who's ideas can get taken and molded into the mainstream.  Until then, I better get making babies and raise them good.
no, no, no. women are far too complex at the core level and actually were built by a vengeful god.
9/11 was an inside job.
She'd have to be insane or an ego maniac to do that... Oh wait...
&gt; We're better in bed too.  But you fail under high load... I don't think that threesome is going to work out.
This reminds me of my idea to write a go/shogi style manga, except about programming.  "I have no idea what referential integrity is, but it sounds exciting!!"
First M1 was released in 1979
libertarianism in dc,progressive thought in the statehouse. 
Whatever that means, ESL boy.
Only on days ending with a "y".
'cept the Romans.
AAAAaaaaaaahhhhhhh, squiiiid.  *drool* ¸¸.•¨¯`•
How bazaar.
I don't mean to be rude, but you've given one example, and a very small country at that. Remember that the original article and the comment to which we are all responding was about human rights. I find it very amusing that everyone here has automatically equated democracy with human rights, but countries like India are proving that it is just not that simple. India is a democracy with a capitalist market, and it *still* can't guarantee everyone's human rights, especially not those of women.   Therefore, while I am certainly not offering a solution, I am saying that repeating "Hong Kong" over and over again certainly isn't either. 
Wanna meet up and talk about it?
I'm already doing this thing (atleast for the past few years), the language is called C++ ;) It has plenty interesting features and I'm still learning new things about the language every day. Much more interesting then Java or C#.  On the other hand it's not exactly the language I like to use, therefore I'm also developing my own, just for fun.  In the near future I might get interested in OCaml though, I've heard good stories about it. Plus, the practical multi-paradigm-approach and syntax seem appealing.
There is one god, and Ron Paul is his prophet.
Can she even afford that? Last I heard she was millions in the red.
Actually anarchy is extremely reasonable. You're thinking of chaos.
&gt;Bad for who? Good for who?  Humans? &gt;Do we have the mandate of Heaven to decide what's bad and good for who?  We have a mandate from reality: Life is good.  &gt;How arrogant of us to decide that we can romp over the planet spreading our particular brand of government through the barrel of a gun!  If other governments only respond to force, and they are bad governments, as I described above, then this is the only way to do it.  &gt;To a country that didn't even attack us!  I wasn't talking about a specific example, fool.
You can always kill someone violating a smoking ban and harvest their organs for sale, but boy, you nuke a coal fired power plant and now you're talking double jeopardy!
Anyone who uses the word 'philandering' is probably so uptight that their vagina dried up long ago.  So methinks a romp in the sack is probably not in their future.
In a so-called "swing state", unfortunately yes. Every election it is the same lately, why we cannot get better voting methods (approval, IRV, Condorcet, etc.) instead of every year bitching the same thing pointlessly...
you've used the wrong one. I used Suse 10 before. hard as hell. it was a nightmare. Ubuntu changed it all for me. it's a real pleasure. 
I mean, he made a lot of money selling those racist papers to people.  But I agree. The racism involved is less "KKK Wizard/HItler" and more "Grumpy old racist guy who don't give a fuck"  I never said he wrote them.   Edit: It sucks to say, [but ron made a good chunk of cash off them](http://www.reason.com/news/show/124426.html)
The statement, "Major combat operations have ended", has a specific military meaning and it was a true statement.  The "Mission Accomplished" banner has been explained over and over again, and it did not refer to the overall war. Is this the best that moveon can do?
Not [in Italy](http://www.google.com/trends?q=beatles,+jesus&amp;date=all&amp;geo=ita&amp;ctab=0&amp;ctab=0&amp;sa=N) ;)
Inherited from someone that earned it. And don't forget that many people have a portion of their retirement savings in oil companies since they tend to be, ya know, profitable. 
What would be required to amass a country wide oil/gas boycott for like 2 days? No one buys gas for 2 days.  Shit would fly.
As we all know Wright loves reddit and is sure to read this wonderfully argumentative and well informed topic.   &lt;/Sarcasm&gt;
Yup yup yup. Join the club.
She can run in the same cloaked Zionist Party that Leiberman ran in.  Clinton, the new Leiberman!  She had better not.  That would cause an anti-Zionist backlash this country hasn't seen and isn't prepared for.
Holy! I wouldn't have thought it possible.
I just bought two copies!
yeah and that guest seems like kind of a dick too.
UPS not USPS
Well, we can look at the current status in the US for this...  The US needs Dr. Paul to be President since the rest of the candidates are crap and having Bush for 8 years has easily destroyed the US and it's economy   and for #5 The US is the most obese nation and people know this.  The US wants CHANGE....  They want to change the political structure and they also want to change the way they look.  Or at least the ones that can read.  Is that strange?  I don't think so. RP 08
Non-volatile memory as fast as RAM, 4 terabits per square centimeter potential. Pure amazing!  Where is the catch?
Yeah, they seemed to get along great.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=R7JPvbVsDdY  :\
No, I'm a person with a keen eye for observation.  Also note that the "s" in "warmest" does not match the "r" in "warmest" or the two "r's" in "regards".
Cue a lot of stupid comments about the coming singularity...
I couldn't help myself.  It seemed so blatantly obvious that a url containing "porn" wouldn't be safe for work.
slava, you can contact me on: dons &lt;&gt; openbsd.org
"...while Clinton fares better against Republican likely nominee John McCain in the latest Associated Press-Ipsos poll." Ding! Ding! Ding! That should be the warning bell for Obama-zombies that their man isn't quite in the lead in the race that actually counts...
I didn't mean to imply that democratisation is by any means a pancaea - although I do think my example demonstrates that *at least in some situations* successful change can come from without. In the case of India, I might merely suggest that it was not developed enough at the time of independence. Edit: And it's not just HK, what about Japan and South Korea?
So that's why Monica was around. So that's why Bill has an office in Harlem. So that's why . . .
http://www.bea.gov/newsreleases/national/gdp/gdpnewsrelease.htm
What about religious group-sex?
Doesn't anyone use expense tracking software? I wrote [moneygement.com](http://www.moneygement.com) for that reason and I find it very handy when I want to know where my money went (then again, I would, wouldn't I)?
I guess they gamed the Amazon bestseller list too. /sarcasm
what the fuck is so important at bazaars anyway? seems like it would be a fun as hanging out at a strip mall to me.  isn't there afghani ebay or something?
I admit my plan is immoral and wrong, but if somebody stole my kid...fuck them.  It's not right, but it is what I would do. I would only shoot people (and I would aim to wound, not kill) if they tryed to stop me looking after my own child or tried to prevent me taking the kid home.  I mean, WTF? In a world where we decry absent fathers we rob other people of their right to parent at all. Why?
thailand, huh?  ... i wonder what he was doing there...?
Obviously. Rome civilized a lot of territory. Unfortunately, we never get to talk about true things at a higher level of abstraction because every nihilist wants to destroy the meaning of civilization.
Not quite.  At this level (overnight rate) it's affecting all financial institutions nationwide.  It serves as a baseline from which the banks calculate the interest rate they will charge to their clients.  The amount of adjustment above this rate (R) depends on the risk of the client.  They might give a rate of R+0.02 for more secure clients and R+0.07 for riskier ones.  Really at this level the interest rate is simply meant to influence the money supply as a whole.
Perot changed 1992. Nader changed 2000. A third party candidate with serious (greater than 5%, which Paul might be able to gather) support, particularly in the so-called "swing states", would be hard to ignore.
&gt; When Gas is a right, then a gas tax will be theft. Stunning.  [This may help you](http://www.mises.org/etexts/taxrob.asp) -- but so would a good definition of 'theft'.  I imagine that yours must be as far beyond the rainbow as "theft is what thieves do".   
they are legal entities
Maybe she is threatening this to blackmail Obama and the rest of the Democrats
Oh that's just awful.  The ex wife should go to  jail.  The abuser should definitely go to jail.  The officers or whatever they were, should go to hell.  
Wow, just... wow.  I was all ready to write this guy off as just another "not enough anarchy in the LP" nutter, then I saw the LP press release that sent him over the edge.  Holy crap.  The LP has been hoodwinked into demanding bigger government by the "think of the children!!!11" straw man argument.  I'm appalled.  And I'm not at all sure that there is anyone left that represents people like Zach, or me for that matter. :(
If we don't attack Iran before it's too late they will just change the "N" in Iran to a "Q" or a "K" and then we'll just have to deal with this whole mess all over again.
Tonight they had people with Parkinsons dancing
I'd bang it out.
She's brazen and shameless... kinda like Dick Cheney.
Did they think no one would notice?
am a hasher. name's malt lickher.:) i should change my reddit login, huh?
Huh?  What distro are you using?  (And why are you dumb enough to continue using it?)
I apply to 4-6 cards in one day when my FICO score hits 750+ and do it again 6 months later. You can take advantage of your 0% interest year by putting the money into a savings account and paying the minimums every month until the last month, where you pay it off.  I also ask for as high of a credit raise as I can on every card every 4-5 months. Before I do so, if I have multiple cards at one institution, I call them up and ask them to merge my credit lines all onto one, leaving only $1,000 on the others. So if I had three cards from Chase at $10,000 limit each, I would make it $28,000, $1,000, and $1,000. So when you call in a couple weeks or months later, you shouldn't have a problem matching that $28,000 on the others.  I never take more than 60% of my total limit out even for the 0% offers because the total debt in comparison to your max credit has a pretty significant affect on your score.  I got my first credit card at 16 and I'm now almost 22 with over $800,000 in available credit including business cards. Credit is only scary when you don't understand it and perhaps if you can't control your spending. I don't really buy anything with the credit. I just use the cards to build up interest in savings accounts pretty much. You should try and avoid stocks because nothing is guaranteed and this is just an on the side thing.  I recommend a Wamu card to start with because they have a nice FICO score feature where you can see your score month by month up to a year ago.  Yodlee's moneycenter is also a great tool for managing multiple accounts.  Oh and I love the filing cabinet idea. I can keep my digital files neat and tidy but when it comes to real life mail and papers I'm a complete mess. Hopefully this will help.
i see how you lumped all of us into that hate category. thanks!
the harlem globetrotters of beer pong ......
Sooo... tell me again then, why hub-to-hub airliners like the A380 don't make sense and why more smaller planes flying to more destinations, like the 787, are the future?
Paul is the prime example of someone who will stick to what he believes in, and that's what he's taught me. I want him to bring back the old Republican party, not abandon it to go independent.
&gt;and Paul just happens to be the guy to carry them out.  He *does* have a mind, you know.  He chose those ideas, and developed them to fit his life, his way of thinking, etc.  If Paul wasn't doing what he's doing right now - no one else would be. Also the allegation that he's campaigning for "the people" and not himself is vicious.  He has good reason to campaign the way he does for himself, and if he were doing it for others he'd be insane.  His selfishness (a good thing) shows when he speaks.  The MSM candidates are running on their policies (anti-constitutional actions, etc.), those policies are just basically unstated.  
that's what she said
parapwnd!
swords are impractical when you have a gun..
Depends.. last year they were fixed to a specific interest rate 6% or so, rather then it being variable (tied to the Fed prime rate).  Before when consolidated, you'd get an averaged rate on the consolidation with your old loans.  However, see  http://www.salliemae.com/after_graduation/manage_your_loans/consolidate_student_loans/  If 2% holds up at July when the loan rates are set. Then it might be good if you can do it.  But Sallie Mae won't want to to do it. If you go private.. you loose many federal repayment and protection benefits.  You could borrow new student loans to pay off the old loans though if you can swing it.  You can also borrow directly from the Dept of Education rather than Sallie Mae..  Here you might be able to get down to 2%.
Bush can't pardon Rove for crimes he hasn't been found guilty for, and he also can't pardon him if it happens after he leaves office. Are the neocons trying to get their dirty laundry done now so that Bush can pardon them all on the last day and make them untouchable by the next president?
I've made an effort to drop or end my intake of HFCS after a couple of my coworkers kept railing against it as a major cause of diabetes and obesity. 
Haha. That's pretty good. I must give credit where credit is due.
In Soviet Russia, Revolution handles YOU! /had to...
Ouch, looks like Knuth will have to start over again
pwnt
You mean like "if/else, while, for" and all that nonsense?
Afraid of getting to old before a better issue management system than Redmine will be written in it, so spilled my doubts here and now. 
These people are not here to tell you the news. They are there to *make money*.  All companies have one goal, and only one goal - to make more and more money. Don't be mad at them, they are only giving people what they pay for. Be mad at all those people, realise how stupid it all is, wonder why you bother getting out of bed to go to work to pay people to kill innocent people on the other side of the world and cry yourself to sleep. It's about all one can do.  This is why the internet is raping them when it comes to wide coverage and acceptance with the young. I would rather find my own information than have people 'decide' what I should hear.
Not in Japan.
&gt;You guys need downtown revitalization  Well, we have [this](http://www.rockettsvillage.com)  But there's also [this](http://www.westbroadvillage.com/) in the burbs.  About the mass transit, I think there's a lot of "Old south" racism/classism involved. People don't want the city folk coming out to use the nice mall. It's why there aren't really buses connecting it now. (Not that people are outright rascist or anything. My sterotypes were broken)  I doubt we will get light rail. We are a Dillon Rule state (strong state gov), and the cities are distinct from the counties. The downtown is largely gentrifying in and around VCU, the large urban university (and biggest in Virginia I believe). The white counties overpower the black city.   Anyways, I'm a political science major, would you recommend urban planning? I'm graduating soon, which means I'm just gonna try and work jobs and take internships, and go back to school eventually. 
It's much older than that, like FUD over diesel (because GM can't build a decent one) -- for instance diesel is cheaper and easier to make than gas, why don't we see that at the pump?  But yes, SUVs have a much higher profit margin than station wagons or minivans...
Americans are short sighted, are you more afraid of an oppressive (communist) government 6 thousand  miles away or 90 miles away? 
No, I pay for the sex. Women are happy to leave me for free. 
As rampant as election fraud has been, I doubt that, but even so, enough eat the fear rhetoric up that "minor" aberrations in the vote counting were sufficient.   More self-damning is the percentage who could not bother to vote at all. 
Obama is a cult personality. All the drama surrounding the campaign, his followers just eat it up.
You're hopelessly out of style.
Well in the past hour since I wrote that comment, the whole tenor of the conversation has changed to where it's a lot more constructive. That reaction of mine was based on the kind of invective towards Persians which was originally the substance of this conversation. I've noticed that things often change for the better in reddit conversations when evening hits north america.
Not in Spain or Portugal.
What a toad. And just like Hannity, he can't go toe-to-toe because his arguments are thin and unsound. 
wait.. so they are going to pay me to take out a loan?? SWEET..
In Soviet Russia, book manifests YOU!
Amazon always gets me with free shipping.  I guess i also want some book suggestions, thanks.
I'm none of the above. For you information, I've had plenty of education on combat effect and stress. I, myself, am a veteran.  I wasn't born into a military family, my parents were lower-middle class at best, and my military service was -- for lack of a better term -- unremarkable.  Still, I'm fully aware of the options available to me. I bet if I made a case of it, I could have the VA classify me as partially disabled. I know I'm entitled to a guaranteed home loan, the $36,000 GI bill, etc.  Essentially, I'm probably on par with that homeless vet except that I haven't used the government as a scapegoat for my failures and shortcomings. Half the time when you talk to a panhandler, you'll find out they're hooked on alcohol and/or drugs.  I remember getting dicked over every which way while I was in, but I'll be damned if I can remember being ordered to toke on a joint or guzzle a six-pack.  What my argument boils down to is that there is personal responsibility to be accounted for in every debate of this nature, and it's uniformly looked over in favor of pissing all over the government or some other authority figure, because people are much more inclined to blame some faceless entity. It's so much easier, isn't it?  P.S. Thanks for complimenting my writing, even if it was just for correctly using a semicolon.
That's iteration (tail-recursion), not recursion ;)
&gt; The real reason he has so much support is wholly because of his sound bytes.  That and his promise to immediately [bring home the troops from Iraq](http://www.barackobama.com/issues/iraq/#bring-home)  "one to two combat brigades each month, and have all of our combat brigades out of Iraq within 16 months". A stance (unequivocal withdrawal), by the way, shared by Ron Paul and touted by him as pretty important, but by neither of the other remaining major candidates.
i think so. it's just that this didn't really elicit belly laughs, or even a minor spasm of the larynx.
old m1 looks better
That's fantastic.
Either my screen sucks or I don't see anything out of the ordinary in the red circle.
Great.  Just great.  When the delegates finally vote for Obama (who has a very solid lead) then Hillary will run as an independant and still leech democrat votes from Obama.   If she runs as an independant (or if Obama does with Hillary as the Dem nominee) it will split the liberal/left vote and give the presidency to McCain.  
they let Americans in as long as they will bash the US government IE: Mikey Moore.
It looks the same to me. Bush is a Christian, yet we don't denounce criticism of his actions as bigotry.
And the currently-sold Hummer is an LEV II, which is significantly better than LEV.  See the [EPA](http://www.epa.gov/greenvehicles/detailedchart.pdf) chart comparing the standards.
But they are real words!
I mean, I'm pretty sure voting for Ron Paul (who I love dearly)who ISNT running instead of throwing your vote to the Libertarian candidate that is, shows a cult of personality. 
#Two words:#  The Cuban Lobby in FLA.  The mini AIPAC, or "baby" AIPAC if you will. America is VERY vulnerable to well funded ethnic lobbies.
Ostriches, heads and sand come to mind.
Here's the abstract from a paper:  "This paper introduces a new internationally comparable data set that permits an empirical investigation of the effects of patent law on innovation. The data have been constructed from the catalogues of two 19th century world fairs: the Crystal Palace Exhibition in London, 1851, and the Centennial Exhibition in Philadelphia, 1876. They include innovations that were not patented, as well as those that were, and innovations from countries both with and without patent laws. I find no evidence that patent laws increased levels of innovative activity but strong evidence that patent systems influenced the distribution of innovative activity across industries. Inventors in countries without patent laws concentrated in industries where secrecy was effective relative to patents, e.g., food processing and scientific instruments. These results suggest that introducing strong and effective patent laws in countries without patents may have stronger effects on changing the direction of innovative activity than on raising the number of innovations."  http://www.nber.org/papers/w9909  So patent law may not increase the amount of innovations, but it does encourage people to innovate in industries where they can't keep their innovations secret.
I dont want to get into the discussion but any "serious" conspiracy theorist would say that it does not matter what the current face of the administration is. Your government is ruled by corporations, which profitted from the 9/11 events, Bush just happened to be useful for their plans.
Italians love The Beatles more than they love jesus
&gt; Companies spend billions upon billions of dollars every year - do you really think they would pour all that money into crappy software?  Yes.
So you believe people should be allowed to starve their children to death so long they claim they didn't mean to? You believe that children are deserving of no societal protection from neglect? 
&gt;There's simply no objective way to say that one practice is absolutely correct or another is absolutely wrong.  Why should it behave like a binary switch, either absolutely correct or absolutely wrong? The fact that it doesn't does not preclude us from saying that one practice is *better* than another, even if it is not absolutely the best.  I don't need to prove that one practice is absolutely correct. I just need to prove that it is better than the other. Because, the claim that oldno (and the rest of his school) make is not simply that there are no absolutes, it's that there's not even a spectrum.  &gt;but ultimately even logic is only as sound as the assumptions and values it is based on.  The assumptions are what the hell we are arguing over! The point is, some assumptions make more sense than others. There are better *reasons* to adopt certain assumptions over others. Some assumptions appeal to more fundamental reasoning than others.  For example, play the devil's advocate for a moment and give me a reason why a man should be allowed to kill a woman in such a way, being in some other culture.  And I'll give you a better reason why that should not be allowed. Even in some other culture.  &gt;Relativism doesn't really need to be justified. It is a given.   So things that are given don't need justification? It's a given that something will fall towards the ground if I drop it. And if I drop my laptop, I don't need to justify that to myself, because, yes, it's a given, and I know it will fall to the ground.  But say I'm taking a physics exam, or doing some other activity which requires me to explain mundane things. And say the third problem states "Explain why objects fall towards the earth."  Answering "Oh, I don't need to. It's a given," would be unacceptable.  Even if it's a given, there should be some explanation available, in case some ignorant fool like myself comes around asking.  There is a world of difference between that which ordinarily does not need to be justified, and that which has no justification.
Mannequin?
Exactly what myth are they busting?
The new Ralph Nader? No, Ralph Nader had good ideas. She's the new... George Wallace.
Uhm... Sounds alot like a plotline lifted from SLC Punk. FYI, your girlfriend is a liar.
You can't knife fight with a sword. What would gang members do?
Cut the psychobabble, dickhead. Would you have sent flowers to Walter Cronkite? (and Helen Thomas is no Walter Cronkite.)
Jesus Christ! Now, when I play drinking games it's always my aim to "lose", because the object is just to get drunk anyway, right?  That being said - I would NEVER play beer pong with these kids!
Was Java ever the thing on Mac OS X? I have been using it since 10.0 and have only used a couple Java apps and they were painful. Java on OS X seems to mean terrible UI and slow as hell. 
birds AND the bees (at least what's left of them)
Ah, good. A tax cut which gives its strongest support to drivers of the least inefficient vehicles.
Thats pretty much what they tell clinically depressed people.  Hey you, the world is shit but only because YOU think it is. Lie to yourself and be happy! Cheer up stupid! I'm not going to be able to fix any problems you have or go back in time and stop the problems happening, but I can prescribe nice, expensive pills!  Or, get the gun and put and end to the whole fucking mess. Why bother struggling in a world that never changes? Why are we all expected to sit there and be treated like shit when we could or may want to just end the ride now? Life is over-rated.
If you want to bitch about endangered species getting killed off, then bitch about mass offshore fishing, pollution, mass market, destruction of natural habitat, and countless other causes that are the real cause for endangered species. **NOT** some fisherman catching a fish, which he ate nonetheless. Its not like he had the fish stuffed and mounted on his wall. He is eating it and what he cannot eat he is giving to others.   Humans are animals and eat meat, btw.  Personal fishing habits have little or nothing to do with the extinction of a fish like this. You can get off your high horse now, and spread your disdain in the correct receptacles.
Java. Or if you want to win an online popularity contest, some other language.
This just fucking pisses me off.
You're going to vote McCain anyway, so what's the difference?  You're an anti-empiricist, and the Republicans have worked hard to make anti-empiricism their brand.
Can you define MSM for the ingnorant/confused?
too bad rick doesn't have a big dick.
I upvoted your comment, though your second paragraph makes me either shudder or think that I couldn't care less. I just haven't figured out which one it is yet.
Their so-called "culture."   I blame Genghis Khan and Tamerlane - for not completely exterminating these scum when they had the chance.
You keep saying that.  Is there some problem with Earth's mass in the future?!
you make a compelling argument.
You're forgetting about files which are inherently not mergeable. Images, word processor documents, spreadsheets, etc. Locking is a way to tell everyone else "hey, I'm working on this file" without having to send an email.  How does one diff &amp; merge a JPEG?
Your assumption that the simplest explanation (i.e., the one that appeals to you) is the logical explanation is one of several types of sand upon which your castle is built. Bragging about your embrace of logic is one thing; practicing reason, logic and rational thought is quite another. If you get these confused you are no less deluded than someone who doesn't even superficially embrace logic.
Ah, either is OK.  Touque/Toque in English and Tuque in French.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tuque
I don't think the article was setting up a contest between Christianity and Islam.
 Nothing can be done. If it could, it would have been done.  It's nothing new. People, countries and politics never change, they just go in cycles. Just be glad we haven't had the thermonuclear war...yet.
APL, or one of its descendants.
Don't feed the troll. They will carry your scent and their parents won't take them back as their own. 
Because it can't fit through the pipe...   the pipe is too small!
OH NOES! INVISIBLE NATO HALP US?
Great.  Another hippie who can't see the damage drugs have done to the homeland asparagus industry.
Throw your condoms in the trash when you're done, dammit.
Me too.  Can someone explain?
Oh, Dallas. I love living in you.
Nice trump!
I believe your obfuscation and unsubstantiated generalities make my point for me.
This PEP is not about adding functionality to the stdlib, it's about refactoring it.
Branching is easy.  It's the merging that can be a bitch. Subversion's getting better, merge tracking in 1.5 should help.
You mean "unpossible"? :-)
What does this have to do with champagne?
Explains Bush.
I'm guessing whatever you're seeing that you're not liking is because she has shadows cast on her face from her hair.
9/11 became an inside job when they refused to listen to countless warnings and alarms about an impending attack. 
Yeah, it's unhealthy stuff. I'd rather breathe air mixed with the exhaust gasses from a modern petrol guzzling sports car. CO2 isn't dangerous for humans but diesel particles are.  For some cars the exhaust is actually cleaner than the air it uses if you drive it in a polluted city.
If you attempt to lie down with wolves, you may get bit. 
I think we're supposed to freak out when we notice the black dude peeking at us from the left.
It can stretch, but it has to continue to be stretched.  I knew a guy who was burned over most of his body (everything but head, hands, and feet, pretty much.)  He has to do a big routine of stretches once or twice a day so the scar tissue doesn't stiffen, but otherwise you'd never know (he always wears jeans and long-sleeved shirts).
that really makes me wish I had invested in Apple years ago...
The payoff-to-risk ratio is pretty amazing, I'll give you that.
That's like freedom beating slavery or something.
&gt;Saying I had sex with her wouldn't be enough.  Yeah no shit. You would describe her vagina to a Jury of your peers.
Deflation is bound to happen.  While it would hurt my debt situation, at least my dollar would be worth something again.
Still, it is a leader that can be dealt with as a head of state.   As opposed to 3600 chieftains.
As we all know Wright loves reddit and is sure to read this wonderfully argumentative and well informed topic. &lt;/Sarcasm&gt; P.S. Stop submitting this over and over.
But I want to live in a *tropical* Canada!
&gt; he never will say that he will be raising taxes  In his [speech announcing his candidacy](http://www.barackobama.com/2007/02/10/remarks_of_senator_barack_obam_11.php), he mentioned after talking about paying down the debt, investing in education and universal health care, that we all must be prepared to be "sharing some measure of sacrifice". I certainly took this to mean both tax raises and reduced standard of living.
Hell, he's not just in the running. He knee-capped a few of the other contestants and shot shot steroids.
Last-Modified: 2008-04-29 23:46:32 +0200 (Tue, 29 Apr 2008)
&gt;I am not avoiding anything.  What do you call personal attacks instead of responding to an argument?  &gt;I just find it amazing that you have no problem killing women and children this is my cause of concern.   I find it amazing that you need to lie about what I say and think. I said that it can be necessary and gave examples. Instead of actually dealing with what I wrote you make stuff up. I do have "problems" with it, I think it is horrible. But the real world sometimes offers horrible choices. The bombing of Dresden was a war crime, the Normandy Invasion wasn't. Civilians died in both and the people in charge new it before hand. You argue, but won't explicitly say for some reason, that the Normandy Invasion was a terrible immoral act. I am not sure what, if anything, you would have done to stop Nazi Germany. 
That it was a phoney? Common knowledge.  That it was a false flag op? Even the linked article doesnt substantiate that.
Oh yes. Redditors especially hate informed factual news articles that refute their cherished myths - so they try to vote it out of existence. But post some hateful crap about the JOOS - sorry, ISRAEL - and you get 18 karma points! Such an incentive. 
Correct me if I'm wrong, but I'm guessing that's a movie about a woman with a toothed, hungry vagina. Sorry, but the Japanese have been animating that for years.
What an utterly strange woman! Lord Krsna might send her back as a maggot next time around.
I think I would snap if this happened to me.  I would probably kill the guy who killed my son. 
Can't help but quote an OSNews comment for this news:  &gt;Theo is so arrogant, he has two remote assholes.  It wasn't me who said it!  *EDIT*: This is, of course, in response to OpenBSD's quote: "We remain proud of OpenBSD's record of more than ten years with only two remote holes in the default install."
its a storage device, unless you count ALL the time lost reading data from the HD it doesnt do shit.
Judging by your smear "imagination of people in the usa", you have a little trouble with unbiased thinking yourself.
Looks good!
Particularly the one headed: "Mostly Harmless".
Clearly they are anarchists.
Apparently they take their oath seriously.
That's cruel.  They were just out for a walk.  
Another lovely artwork for you to enjoy as seen at NYC's Chambers Street subway platform. 
&gt; Paul never wrote those letters.   He claims he never wrote them but refuses to name the supposed ghostwriter. The ghostwriter claim is a much more recent excuse, when he was originally asked about the newsletters he defended those racist words as though they were his and he believed them. Why would he defend words he didn't write and didn't believe in? 
Aw, hell, do I have to explain everything? Corporations have more money, foo!
I don't see why. If that girl was wearing a swimsuit no one would care. Is underwear somehow more revealing? I had the read the article to figure out what was wrong with this pic.  Also, I don't understand the flap about Cyrus. If she wore a backless dress, no one would care. Frankly, that pic made her face look less cartoonish.
We're still here and we're asking which line in the article mentions false flag ops.
posted several times
And 15 - and fucking.  Lucky kid whose doing the deed eh? Imagine him in 10 years down the pub.  *hey, dude, guess whose hymen I broke...*
The Jr. Senator from IL was running with a final 4 hoops team and was in the flow of the game. The layup, adjusted for a 6'9" player of the year bearing down on him, spun out. C'mon. This guy isn't running for the NBA he's runnning for president. That he bowled a 37 in 5 frames (+ 2 frames of children tossing gutterballs) is the asinine exemplar of the MSM. Pick the most facile story line (help from Fox and Drudge) and then just run with it regardless of facts until another story line becomes easier to push.  This is a guy who paid off his student loans 3 years ago. This injected idea of haughtiness is absurd. Please internets kill the 24s sooner rather than later. Thanks.
What is wrong with killing huge amazing animals? It happens all around the world everyday. Protein is a necessary part of many mammal's diets. 
says the Daily Mail.
au·to·bi·og·ra·phy - a history of a person's life written or told by that person.  why the fuck would canada's sensible media have a better grasp on this news? 
Heh.  Smart kitty.  :-)
thanks mom
Rocketts Landing looks nice. West Broad Village is great, if there are jobs there for professionals, but of course I think it should be connected with rail. :)  I don't doubt that you'll get rail - it'll eventually be that or the city will fail. We can't really take gas prices like they're going.  I agree with you that it's racist. Did you see the PBS documentary "The Color Line"? They talk about how richer black people are starting to move back into the South to reclaim their families' pasts. I don't know that it'll have a significant impact, but hey.  I certainly don't know much about political science. I *love* urban planning - it's intertwined with the approaching climate change issues, so it's a great time to be involved. In fact, today, I was liveblogging the Urban Land Institute's Reality Check workshop in Seattle - at http://seatrans.blogspot.com.
Imagine all the people...
&gt;It is a specific response to your statement that because their beliefs were not held by people outside of their immediate family, their beliefs should have less protection.  Making stuff up doesn't help your case any.  It's **NOT** even the belief of that family. Have you even read ONE interview with these people? They have never said that they think--as you claimed--that a person who goes to the doctor goes to hell. They even said they had nothing against doctors.  &gt;The family believes in the Bible, which says healing comes from God, but they have nothing against doctors, she [the mom] said.  &gt;Dale Neumann, 46, a former police officer, has said he has friends who are doctors and started CPR "as soon as the breath of life left" his daughter's body.   ***  &gt;As far as "people keep answering me", people keep telling me what the law is, not why they think it is legitimate.  I think many people have told you that they believe that children--who do not have the power or the judgement to make and enforce their own medical decisions--are entitled legally to protection from society when a parent's behavior puts their life at risk or costs them their life.  You simply don't want to hear this.
Assuming everyone who doesn't agree with you is a kid and "will grow out of it"? Maybe you are the one who is jealous of something.  From the comments I usually find in the political section, and judging by how each one gets modded by reddit, I'm fairly certain you are incorrect in your assumption that reddit is "full of kids who are just becoming politically aware".   Is it possible that, just maybe, the internet causes large groups of people with similar ideologies to unite by giving them a space to share? No, it must just be little kids who will one day grow up to be as wise as you, I'm sure. 
Um, can anyone give be a basic better understanding of this component? ie, why ought it be considered a "basic component" along with the resistor, cap, and inductor? What motivated the definition of the component all those years ago?
Yeah but the Zionist neocons are laughing at this picture. Nobody hates like a Semite hates.
&gt; cold hard embrace of real world enterprise  &gt; level programming  More like some sort of hideous ambulatory lutefisk monster embrace.  Cold? Sure. Let's make him a clammy mutant lutefisk beast.   But hard? No, he's getting closer.  You punch him, and *your fist sinks right in*, putridly fishy lutefisk oozing through your fingers. You  are disgusted.  And now you've unavoidably drawn closer to him. Too close. He's hugging you.  "Eggshammelll", he whispers, slurring and hissing, "eggssshammell", lye-breath making you shrink back.  The name of his grey god? But you can't get away... The enterprise lutefisk horror wants to integrate something. Integrate with you... intimately.   You faint as he squirms into your nostrils and mouth, cutting off your oxygen.   Not to worry. His tissue infiltrates your own... it will provide a new kind of sustenance.  You will start the cycle anew, feeding, always feeding, and converting fresh young programmers into your deliciously fishy lutefisk brethen.   Yep. That's "enterprise level" programming for you.  "Iä, Iä, EggShammEll fthagn!"
It seems to have worked pretty well on Japan, eh?
Playboy: Someone who sleeps around.  Philanderer: Someone who won't sleep with me.
WTF?? This is the worst story I've read all week.
Anybody consider that the 'attacks' were really (non)symbolic 'attacks' on global capitalism..?
They didn't seem to be trying to sue Big Lots or anything.  Just inform them that they found something that should not have been there.   If I was the manager I would have thanked them for letting me know, assured them that it wasn't in any way policy to let stuff like this happen and tell them they would check out the rest of the toy section to make sure it's okay, and then actually check out the other toys in the toy section of the store.  You know, the same general thing they would have done if they found out somebody had puked in the bathroom.   Check it out, and clean it up if there's really a problem. But then, making sure you piss them off by telling them to fuck off -- that just makes shit loads of sense.  I mean, why didn't I think of that?
I didnt'say I had. I didn't express an opinion on the matter. All I'm saying is that people sit here and say, "it makes sense to do ______, why aren't we?!" when they really don't understand all the little factors that are involved in such a project. 
Says something negative about the likes of  JohnStanier's judgement, that's for sure. 
You're overlapping more than one meaning of the word "imagination" in your statement.  I don't mean imagination in the sense of "vision for the future," or as in "creative potential" or "imaginary friend." I am talking about paranoia. I'm not insulting the creativity of people in the usa.  As I recommended to others, I'll tell you as well: if people in the usa want to read about Afghanistan, [they should pick a better news source than the AP](http://www.google.com/search?client=opera&amp;rls=en&amp;q=site:cbc.ca+afghanistan&amp;sourceid=opera&amp;ie=utf-8&amp;oe=utf-8).
you should learn the java language first, while learning HTML, then learn jsp so that it all makes sense. then figure out javascript.. 
It is completely normal for newborns to lose weight, especially if the baby is breastfed.  I can't believe they took the baby away for 10 ounces!
Hillary Clinton is the new Barack Obama/
And here I thought they were being punished for not telling them the information they want! Wow I was way off! 
Having done both synchronous and asynchronous CPU design by hand, I would say that asynchronous design is inherently harder.  In asynchronous design you have to ensure that outputs aren't read before they're ready.  And you have to ensure that is the case in every single little corner of the CPU.  When you think about the complexity of CPUs in general, this task is mind boggling.  Building tools to help you achieve this is incredibly difficult as well.  In synchronous design you essentially only have to fulfill one criterion:  That the data is ready *anytime* before the next clock tick.  It's an easier problem to tackle, especially in a digital world.
&gt; Why are tens of millions being spent repairing the roads in my city if the government is so useless and corrupt? Also stunning!  I've often wondered at what kind of sheep accept the state's argument that its incalculable 'services' can be equated to its *expeditures* on them.  And here you are.  Do you also believe that what state schools most need, to finally perhaps catch up to the pre-DoE state schools, is more money?  Can a politician win your vote by promising to double the waste? &gt; Ah, the myth that 100% of the government is corrupt and useless. No.  Read the actual myths that I referred to: 1. the myth of My Taxes Are Used Properly 2. the Myth of National Defense If you can't read these without flying off to a comforting, pre-destroyed caricature -- well, this basic logic failure certainly goes well with the credulity you display above. A brief attack on #1: at all levels of (at least Federal) government, throughout the military and in the Congress, units are given budgets of tax-dollars to last them a fiscal year.  In the Congress, leftover money goes to bonuses for the staff.  In the military, leftover money goes to anything that could possibly seem justifiable from a distance -- it's called 'windfall cash'.  When September rolls around, break out your wishlist and explain why your office's customer-service whiteboard *totally* needs to be replaced by a giant plasma TV.  Don't have a wishlist?  Come up with $10,000 of one -- perhaps of a certain nature -- by the end of the week, that's an order! If anyone in a position to refuse to waste taxpayer money does so, the military unit's budget gets cut by so much, and all of the next year's shortages come back on that person.  Fantastic waste is baked into the entire system. For #2?  Google it.
Of course they taste different. The point is that their taste isn't terribly strong. Just like calamari. I'd say that both calamari and muscles have little taste to them in and of themselves, but that doesn't mean they taste the same.
Cheap, high-speed, non-volatile memory will certainly make it a lot quicker to turn the RDBMS on, and probably simplify the internal design by eliminating the disk-to-memory issues.  On the other hand, most of the barriers to what people want (or think they want) from relational databases are semantic, not hardware-related. For example, there is the fact that a top-quality RDBMS is expected to support multi-user transactions, out-of-process, and over a network. There still need to be periodic backups and crash recovery capabilities. Those require trade-offs.  I might be wrong about this, but I think the disk drives of today could very nearly serve as the RAM of 25 years ago, and be almost as non-volatile as memristors. Were we not so obsessed with performance, the memristor would be a minor event in terms of storage (but maybe still appealing in its other respects).   Unless maybe there is something about the memristor that would take us beyond the current limits of Turing completeness?
Brian Williams is just doing the usual comedic newsman that we all expect.  He has great timing for a comedian. Just to remind people, the news is entertainment.  Not anything that we actually should care about.
i picked it up while on vacation in south carolina last week.  fantastic book.  i think it will prove extremely important in the furtherance of intellectual honesty first, and libertarianism second.
I waited a day so I don't get horribly downmodded - but I'd really rather you vote for Obama. ;)
Did you watch it? He stressed that you have to stir the entire time, and constantly remove it from heat, which he did. That is exactly what I said in my original post.
Where does the article even mention false flag operations?  These transcripts just seem to corroborate the story we already know: that the first part was purposefully provoked out of the Vietnamese and that the second event never even happened- that the 'damn drunken sailors were just shooting at flying fishes' as LBJ once said.   I'd also like to point out that this story that posits the incident as an outright fabrication (and not a false flag op) is corroborated by most records and is generally accepted by most historians.
Noel Keenlyside stressed that the results were just the initial findings from a new computer model of how the oceans behave over decades and **it would be wholly misleading to infer that global warming, in the sense of the enhanced greenhouse effect from increased carbon emissions, had gone away.**   
agreed mr. poo bag.
He was responding to someone who was complaining about getting Apache working with Python (which confuses me...deploying most Python web apps is almost as easy as PHP or Perl, though trac manages to not be easy due to its really long complex dependency chain) in a thread about an app built with Ruby on Rails.  Presumably the Python complaint was in support of this new app...which will, in fact, be much harder for the average user to make work than trac, because deploying RoR apps sucks (I like Ruby and I like RoR, but the deployment problem is serious).
Correct, but what the Fed wants and what the Fed gets aren't necessarily the same.  Right now, much of the additional liquidity pumped into the system is being eaten up by banks trying to shore up their balance sheets.  And much of the rest is eaten up by consumers trying to shore up *their* balance sheets.  So while the Fed Funds Rate has fallen to 2%, retail mortgage rates are *higher* than they were a year ago. That's what the phrase "pushing on a string" refers to.  The Fed has control over the money supply only so long as normal consumer behavior (i.e. "spend a large part of your income, and borrow to spend more") reigns.  If there's a widespread change in consumer attitudes - like people panicking and paying down their debt, or banks panicking and refusing to write new loans regardless of how cheaply they can get funds - then the economy will do what it wants regardless of what the Fed wants.
I wonder if it's something genetic.  Have they tried wearing shorts? Also, are Linux users affected?  I noticed a lot of them smell sweaty.  
Not a chance. She'd rather be senate majority leader than piss of the entire democratic party. She'd have to sit with Lieberman in the Senate lunch room.
me too :)
Bah...such BS questions anyway. Without *any* substance whatsoever and the answer is fairly obvious what *anybody* would say to those...  Pointless.
Not to mention men who just can't get a partner because they are not alpha men. You can be a nice average guy yet always lose to the jocks.  Evolution hates nice guys.
Bubba 8:28   Yeah, though our bellies are wide with the meat of McDonald, we shall persevere to propel our corpulent extremities into the acid-anointed azure canvas.  For that is the will and aim of our Lord Sam Walton and his disciple Charlton Heston.  
Why I totally support Corporate Death Penalty. I think CA was flirting with that.  But It won't ever fly cause corps have the perfect defense -&gt; punishing us will hurt the economy so let us get away with most anything, esp things that make us earn money cause you know, it helps the economy.
I for one am considering it.  I've got $1300 in bills and only $300 to do it with.
Can we torture Scalia? I bet he has lots of information.
No, I think his argument is "right makes might makes right".
I think mine was a version of Ubuntu, but I'm not that great with computers and I was setting it up myself.
I've always heard that you rob the truck of __his__ gas mileage when you do that.  But I'm not so sure.  It seems to me that the two of you __as a system__ travels more efficiently than the two of you separately.  I mean to say that the truck also sees some increased efficiency from the arrangement due to the fact that the following car is pushing air in front of it, thus partially filling the vacuum that is behind the truck, thus reducing the drag on the truck.  Of course the following car gets the most out of it, but the truck benefits a little bit, too.
Not really. Many men pay for the cuddling and just to talk. We can be as clingy as any woman, but women hate it so we lie to you so you will like us. It's a sick little game which I hate intently, almost as much as I hate evolution for creating it. Would you like a man who was clingy? I mean as much as a woman can be and still be seen as normal?  Have you heard of the Girlfriend Experience? Google it.  Most average women can find a man willing to take them on. Many average men never find a good woman. Sex is a commodity for women only, for men it is something you have to fight very hard to get at all unless you are at the top of the pyramid. We are all in competition with each other and most of us have to lose so the few can win.  Fucking darwin and his logic. I was happy living with the lies sir!
I know, right? And the blue collar workers love Hillary, and the blackies love Obama, and the crazies love Ron Paul! I love collectivization!  Individualism and personal freedom are too much for me, I don't like making decisions... You know, thinking for myself is just too darn hard!  When will the rest of these dumbasses on reddit join us, Hosiah? Don't they understand how much easier it is to accept the popular culture as gospel?
West Braoad Villiage is planted in the middle of suburban sprawl that is getting worse and worse. It's pretty unwalkable/unbikeable, although I have biked it. Anyway, I understand gas is pricey, but the Richmond region is pretty notorious for having a lack of regional cooperation.   Yeah, I want to do something that involves environmentalism. It's moral and soon to be profitable. I applied to learn to be an organic farmer, but that failed. I should take some internships. I'm interested in law, but I'm open to any practical graduate degree I could do with a poli sci degree. Guess I just gotta dive into stuff. 
That would be if Paul got elected.  I gotta go buy Dianetics 500 times or Hubbard will eat my ass alive.
I see this particular glass as half-full.  This country is nowhere *near* being ready to elect a lady (*ahem*) who will have started her career as a Republican Goldwater Girl, became a "lifelong" Democrat (more dictatorial than socialist, but I digress...), and then who decides to switch party affiliations at virtually the last minute. *Addendum:  And she figures she'd win against McCain and Obama HOW, exactly?*
Are you paid in USD or land in the "liberated" areas?
Denial is the entire reason that conspiracy theories continue to exist. The people who perpetuate them have already made up their minds and either subconsciously twist facts to support their conclusion, discarding much clearer evidence to the contrary, or believe statements supporting their viewpoint without doing any fact checking and again ignoring evidence to the contrary.
You can't go around calling "shenanigans" on innocent people. That's how wars get started.
I think you meant to type "fake military analyst." Misplaced left quotation mark. 
Nice news source. Clinton loses to McCain in polls straight up in Colorado - now she's going to beat him and Obama (who outpolls him) in a 3 way race?   Also note that Mrs. Clinton's electoral total receives boon from winning New Mexico twice.
If she runs as an independent, it is ALL THE MORE REASON that anyone who cares about this country should fight against John McCain and his warmongering rich friends and corporate lobbyists.  Hillary is ALREADY hurting the Democratic party.  Would she stoop to this???  (yeah, she might)  Remember:  fight, fight, fight... contribute... do anything you can to defeat McCain.
Because they contribute more money to politicians.
this pic is full of fail
those people didn't buy those computers.. they were provided. With that said, Apple does charge a premium for their proprietary hardware platform, so their margins are much higher than say, dell.   To me it is interesting the mass migration of computer scientists to Mac hardware. It seems counterintuitive that people who embrace open source software love proprietary, non-commoditized hardware. 
Yes, he did:  http://www.tnr.com/politics/story.html?id=e2f15397-a3c7-4720-ac15-4532a7da84ca  Ron Paul's own remarks on this subject are self-serving and disingenuous, as one would expect; the newsletters themselves speak for themselves. Ron Paul's name is in big letters on their masthead, his signature on them, and the unmistakable pawprints of his favorite policy analyst, racist idealogue Lew Rockwell, all over them. The pimping for American Renaissance, the endorsements of David Duke, the venomous racist abuse and psychotic homophobic language, it's all right there.  Ron Paul's supporters are deeply embarrassed about the inconvenient opinions of their Dear Leader, but it would never occur to them to support a better candidate. Instead they dodge, whine, spin and outright lie about their beloved Klansgnome.
It would make sense to separate out the super-rich older Jews who are super-Zionists and care less about the Democratic Party.  They just want Hillary in there because she'll attack Iran.  Fuck America, those traitors could care less.
Fuck Islam.
They want to know why so many humans ocean themselves.
For those who don't understand what he's talking about: http://zeitgeistmovie.com/
i apologize to you, for that user's (treezequeen) undefined comment(instead of),nevermind those childish comments.
It's not actually that wide. Look at the size of the workers standing on the edge, it's a bit  scary.
"American public discourse is so debased by loose thinking, political chicanery, pious pretensions, and the advertising mentality that it is carried on mostly in self-contradictory slogans. Sometimes contradictory terms are put together to describe something that the speaker, through delusion or wishful thinking, believes to exist though it does not. Sometimes it is deliberate deceit."
Jesus speak *American*.   Me speak *caveman*.  
&gt;PLO is not Hamas, I was talking about Hamas and Hizbollah.  Did you have an actual point regarding Hamas?  &gt;Hizbollah has not attacked Israel since the withdrawal check your facts.  Thanks, I will.  Ok, done: [Zar'it-Shtula incident](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Zar%27it-Shtula_incident)  &gt;Again, you did not read what I said I strickly stated Hamas/Hizbollah ANY GROUP attacking civilians and killing them I condemn. You have yet to do that re: Israel.  You are right: I condemn anyone **targeting** civilians, I don't condemn attacks on military targets where there was reasonable efforts to avoid civilian deaths. Again: the Dresden firestorm was a war crime, the Normandy Invasion was not.  &gt;I have read it in arabic.  Great, so what is wrong with the translation here: [http://www.yale.edu/lawweb/avalon/mideast/hamas.htm](http://www.yale.edu/lawweb/avalon/mideast/hamas.htm). If you have better translation let me know.  &gt;Dhimma does not apply here, I don't know if your Muslim scholar but your facts are very off.  How does it not apply? The distress with the Jews began in the 19th century as the Turkish laws against Dhimma were relaxed and as Jews started to refuse to accept their second class state. Hamas has made it clear that they might accept Jews in Palestine, but only has dhimmi, as second class people subservient to Muslims.  &gt;Jews and Muslims have lived thousands of years in peace...again check your facts.  Ok, I will.  [Damascus affair](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Damascus_affair)  The relationship between Jews and Muslims is not at all simple and largely depended on Jews being willing to know their place.  &gt;So, what? You are not using the correct terms to use a dialogue. So what?  Huh?  &gt;I clearly state killing civilians is wrong. If you think civilians are terrorist, then I guess you have major problems.  Huh?   &gt;However, you have not in any of your emails  I have not sent you a single email.
Autobiographies often give very biased accounts of situations. I'm not saying abuse doesn't occur. But my concern about the kind of autobiographies which nomorewear has read, is the same concern that I would have hearing people talk about "thinking of the victim's feelings" when the sentencing hearing for an aggressor is taking place. Invective is not constructive. First person accounts are good to read - but not in the absence of other kinds of context... and those articles from cbc.ca which I offered him offer a much broader perspective on things.
Is Barrack Obama gonna have to choke a bitch?
From the blog article, not the one at the top of the page. "Rice states: The United States needs to be able to locally purchase food."  Does anyone know what she is talking about? Doesn't it already have that right and ability?
You know, foldl, it doesn't matter how much you try - if reddit haven't implemented killfiles or ignore lists by now, it's pretty clear they're not going to just because you have an attack of the fuckwits.  ... Well done. You've exacted two points of vengeance upon me. Aren't you the big swinging dick now?
I was at an MS event some years back, just before the launch of Team System (which I know very little about). Outside on a break in between sessions, an MS dev and an "evangelist" freely admitted that VSS is hopelessly fucked, utterly unsuitable for "any project with more than 2 developers". MS hasn't been dogfooding it for years - if indeed they ever did.
"Hello. My Name Is Inigo Montoya. You Killed My Father. Prepare to Die."
Yup. And sitting there, eyes closed, hands over your ears going "Lalalalalalalalalalala" makes everything go away.
If Hillary actually did this, she would never become president. Never become house leader but would have a reputation you wouldn't want to touch with a barge pole.  Bill wouldn't let her neither, Legacy and all.   "Hillary i can't let you make us the new Bushes"
countdown to dr. noonian soongh...
I have never seen this article,and I refresh this site too many times a day.Good luck.
How the fuck can this kind of injustice just go unnoticed? Where is the damn judge?
Garbage sells, thus the ranking of Paul's book. 
Met him once. Thought he was full of shit. Now I am older and I know better.
Yes, exactly. Men want sex and they will get it. I'm not gay but I totally see why it must rock to be gay.  Women on the other hand - don't usually want sex unless you are rich, powerful, or socially adept. If you are just average in all three groups you are pretty (un)fucked. There will always be a better man for the girls to go for than the average man.
My fish would not approve of your suggestion.
Man... I have no idea what you're talking about.  
We can't be gay anymore than gay men can be straight. Sexual orientation is not a choice.
Older than Al Gore.
Yeah, because they pretty much fuckin' have to now, because Reagan tilted wealth so far in the investor direction. If you want to retire and you're relying on our government, whom you paid taxes to for 40 years, to make you comfortable, forget it. Thanks Reagan! Yay retirement 401ks, put your money in and you don't have to withdraw during a market downturn! They're just FANTASTIC for middle class people. *barf*
Timmy's a little pussy. Remember that when Cheney wanted to spread lies to the American people he told his staff to put him on Meet the Press with Tim Russert. 
I'd call it her Nom Nom. 
Seriously, this was just so out-there I almost suspect them all of being hired actors.
If Freddy Mercury was willing to demonstrate it, it must be brilliant.
What Ron Paul believes in evolution or that he put his name on racist newsletters doesn't matter to me. We aren't electing a scientist at the NIH or president of the NAACP, we're electing the commander in chief of America.   I tend to vote based on the candidates issues. Luckily, Ron is honest about them, and his record shows consistency too. You just don't find that in any other candidate, except maybe Kucinich or Gravel.   So, you can cast your superficial judgement aside. My judgement is just fine. 
So, is it $4k for just the battery pack and the  electric motors are seperate (that's the way the article sounds, but I'm not sure), or does that include the electric motors?
"Semite" is a word which describes both Arabs and Israelis.
I agree completely.  The Dems are gonna control the house and senate after this election, and she knows it.  They'll offer her something in return for backing down.  She wants power, not obscurity.  
&gt;"That filled his newsletter over the years"  I assume you mean the isolated incident over which he had no control? Yeah, go jump off your bridge, troll.
Never gonna give it up. 
Mutilation of another is indeed universally wrong, I don't care if it's in the West as circumcision.   There are many things that are universal, I would suggest you read the UN Universal Declaration of Human Rights:  http://www.un.org/Overview/rights.html  The original topic of this post seems to violate multiple articles of the UN Declaration and thus I feel comfortable in declaring the actions described "Universally Wrong".  It's not merely a different point of view, you're quite simply wrong.  End of discussion.
I listened to both back to back. The main parts of that guys song are almost identical to the main part of Clocks.  The second instrument that comes in. It is the exact same melody. Listen again.
Classic.
Obama needs this mess of a primary over quickly and Clinton to accept she has lost ASAP to promote unity within the party.   I just want to see Obama go up against McCain in a debate... you know that'll be full of comedy.
To Poster: A woman's nipples shift if their breasts are large. This happens for sure with real ones and I have no idea about fake ones.  Ugh. I know I'm boring and state the truth that no one wants to hear but I would hate for men to think that women are perfect.
Any suggestions as to who this better candidate may be?
Stop taking your stories from [Snopes](http://www.snopes.com/horrors/drugs/orange.asp)
You gave them a Bogey Man, now they are using it to scare their peers.  Surprised?  
FWF much?
And you got one.  Quite a few actually!
&gt;So then you believe that genital mutilation is universally wrong?  Yep.  &gt;What about circumcision of male infants in the Western world? Is this not wrong?  Nope, it's wrong. In any case, the most common female "circumcision" practices are *not even comparable* to male circumcision. To equivocate the two is offensive, and usually the work of relativists like yourself who don't care about pain and suffering. The most commonly practiced forms of female "circumcision" involves much more.
JavaScript, of course.  It's going grow to be the most popular language, and will remain so for the next 10 years.  But, I would never suggest someone learn only one language.  Three or four is about right.  A functional language (Lisp, Scheme, Haskell), a dynamic multi-paradigm language (Perl, Python, Ruby, JavaScript), and maybe a systems language...C is the simplest, and probably all you really need, since you'll hopefully only be writing a few performance critical pieces in the systems language and everything else in a nicer/safer language, but C++, Objective C, and Java would also work.  Oh, and of course you need to know the default shell of your OS quite well if you want to be productive as a developer.  You need to be able to automate tedious tasks, and the shell is very often the quickest way to do that.  I like bash.
Leiberman ran as an "Independent," telling the Democratic Party to fuck off as soon as he lost the primary.  He was funded and elected by older rich Jews who tend to be Zionists.  Hillary is thinking of pulling exactly the same thing.  Fuck the Democratic Party, and the country.  Israel first!  If anyone doubts this, remember that full page ad those Hillary supporters took out?  The vast majority of them are rich Zionist Jews. Goddamned traitors.  Those CUFI psychos too.   www.philipweiss.org for the truth.
You're right. As is often said, "free" means "free as in speech, not free as in beer."
Obviously we need to invent the time machine, go back in time, and force Tim Berners-Lee to use web as the prefix instead of www. Then we'd have something that's not hard to say.
sweet. i want to download a vinyl album and print it out.
what are you talking about a dollar is a dollar is a dollar this rate determines the price of short term borrowing between banks and the FED
Couldn't have said it better finis -- the author is rather disingenuous regarding Red Hat's business model -- the same business model that dragged the open source movement through the nineties and is the reason why most of our webservers are still running *nix and apache.
Yeah, it's a petty post. It's certainly not a high-brow discussion about theology and atheism, but sometimes it's nice to have an indulgent chuckle at the ridiculous fallacies rather than argue logically with illogical stupidity. 
Some of the more recent in my wish list:  Lost in the Cosmos: The Last Self-Help Book by Walker Percy  The Metaphysical Club: A Story of Ideas in America by Louis Menand  All New Square Foot Gardening Grand Theft Childhood: The Surprising Truth About Violent Video Games and What Parents Can Do by Lawrence Kutner and Cheryl Olson  And some music. Yes, actual CDs.
You can't blame someone for something they didn't write or were not aware of. This is so petty.  [http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A6rxts0-f9w](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A6rxts0-f9w)
All 3 candidates have large followings. While this is grave new it may actually lead to a serious 3 way campaign. Nader etc never had a chance of winning.  A 3rd serious party would immediately change the political landscape for good. If this does happen, I hope it works out the way my deluded brain hopes it will. But I'm guessing we're all just fucked.
Unless you're in the Family International / Children of God.
She was arrested for escaping from prison.
cost?
Must be a really good book. There has been a few times that Amazon has been used as a sort of vote on other things outside of the book market, such as when Noam Chomsky's book went to the first spot after Hugo Chavez recommended it.
Wait wait, I've almost got this...  It's *okay* to kill millions in pursuit of oil.   But a few deaths result from dress-code-gone-fanatical and it's time to get excited...  Have I got it? Is this right?  Seriously. Yeah, honor killings are fucked up. But war-for-oil is **FUCKED UP**.  With a CAPITAL F.U.C.K.  Just your daily reminder of context and scale. 
It shows me convincingly enough that it is possible to successfully Westernise societies through outside pressure, a point that has been denied by a number of people in this thread.
it's honeycomb
PONY TAx HOLIDAY. FREE PONEIS FOR EVERYBODY.
All your base are belong to us
You are the one misleading now. David Duke endorsed Ron Paul, not vice versa.   As for the other racism, yeah it's bad, but it's not advocating violence, it's just plain stupid. 
Yeah, the headline is a bit overgeneralized. Specifically, the statement refers to the conversion of agricultural resources from food production to biofuels production. And that is truly evil.  All ethanol production should switch over to feed stocks based on waste products and nonagricultural cellulose sources (e.g. switchgrass),  
Wait....I can stretch right, left *and* down??  **SOLD.**
Now I can get FM too
patrick bateman.. american psycho?
I think there is a stark difference here.  In the civilized world, if a man kills his wife for committing adultery, he will be arrested and likely go to prison.  The man in Afghanistan who kills his wife because she left the house without permission is not punished, he is justified.  Your willingness to justify this behavior because it stems from another "culture" is sickening. Yes, not only is it crazy, it is sick, inhumane and wrong.
If this is true, it must be part of God's clever plan to destroy America.
What?  After sex, I want MORE sex. And perhaps snuggling afterwards. I wouldnt make the girl feel dirty, in fact I feel closer and more personally involved BECAUSE she has let me inside her most personal space, yet I cannot express these feelings with most women because they rebuke me or insult me if i do.  I don't want to kick the girl out, but you have to keep up appearances or they will kick YOU out. If you're clingy or seem desperate, women will kick you to the curb faster than you can say 'd'oh!'. Women play this game more than the men do, but they won't admit that they can be as shallow as men can.
Quit hating on my boy Hans Rey.  That man's got more balls than any other biker out there.  THis nigga will EAT Lance Armstrong's bitch ass any day. 
&gt;I'd call it her Nom Nom.  For the record, did you Om Nom Nom?
Disagree with the first 1/2, agree with the second.
And according to the Scotsman, a human and a FROG... 
Stick your libertarian idealism up your ass.  [Exxon has spent the last 14 years avoiding paying for their pollution from the Valdez.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Exxon_Valdez_oil_spill#Litigation)  Back here in the real wold, your "just so" idealism is useless and you know it.  [Also see the Bhopal atrocity.  How long do you suppose Union Carbide could fight those suits off?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bhopal_Disaster)  Edited to add:  Actually, lets break it down in really fine detail, using Union Carbide's poison gas leak.  My proposal:  Government regulators inspect companies that store and produce toxic chemicals to ensure the staff has appropriate education and that safety equipment works properly.  Your proposal:  Government stays the fuck out.  Through negligent behavior, Union Carbide allows 40 tons of poison gas to escape, killing 3000-15000 people and injuring another 100,000.  These dead or injured people are now supposed to hire 100,000 lawyers and each file suit against Union Carbide?  How much do you sue for when somebody poisons your family to death?  Who sues if the poison wiped out a whole family?  How long can Union Carbide avoid paying?  How will the injured pay for treatment in the meantime?   I'm sure the chemical giants appreciate you looking out for their right to skimp on safety and maybe poison us in our sleep.
Yah, it's ok when those poor banks steal from the people through the racket called the Federal Reserve, but when the people get it, it's welfare.
Even though that ad probably does not portray what the title of the post suggests, small children (like my daughter) would regularly "breast feed" her dolls because that's what she saw mommy doing.  Nothing weird about it.
Dude, you're an asshole.
If the corporate media keeps it up, reddit.com will kick its ass. But this will take 50 years because the TeeVee watchers need to die off.
Who is she posing for?  I mean, if **we** didn't have someone there specifically to take photos already, who uh... I mean... you know what I mean.
Right, I think it's more have one account for investments, not have one investment.  You can have multiple investments in the same account.
« Yes, of course, because Ubuntu's web site promises that the distro "will always be free of charge, including enterprise releases and security updates." Don't go thinking that this is some fast moving beta like Fedora that will only be supported for a few quarters and is therefore designed to push you into paying real money for a more stable version like RHEL. »  Oh my God, I'm, like finisterra, amazed by how this man doesn't understand AT ALL that we can MAKE MONEY with free softwares... He despises Red Hat only because they make money with their distribution... How funny... And about fedora... pity « fedora is a free demo for RHEL »..., I think he doesn't understand anything...
Fails the sniff test.
Even 63 visits from the Vatican; I guess the Pope needs his weekly *Lost* fix, too.
mirror: http://209.85.173.104/search?q=cache:wJDEiZzEPaQJ:www.miamiherald.com/dave_barry/story/493795.html+http://www.miamiherald.com/283/story/493795.html&amp;hl=en&amp;ct=clnk&amp;cd=1&amp;gl=us
&gt; haven't personally found a use for it  So find one!  Lots of fun problems involve recursion.
I don't get why people still make these stupid lists. The iPhone is out and people are buying it in droves. If you want a Blackberry, get a fucking Blackberry. If you want an iPhone, be prepared to be pissed at by Blackberry owners who never grew up after middle school. Fucking stupid.
that would be Dr. Poo Bag to you, sir.
It actually seems to offer evidence contradicting the notion that LBJ and company wanted to create an incident to get the US involved in the war. Look at this: &gt; President Johnson: So obviously now, if you go put this in the paper...and your enemy reads about it then he thinks we're already taking off and obviously you've got us in a war. &gt; Secretary McNamara: Exactly. I was going to start my remarks by that, but be damn sure it doesn't, or try to be sure it doesn't get in the paper. It looks like they are looking at war as a **bad** thing, not a good thing.
&gt;Sure, they are both meaningful. But to suggest they're equally meaningful is presumptuous.  Nobody's suggested they are equal but you.   &gt;Or you could just pray for an answer...  Here is a little surprise for you:  I AM AN ATHEIST
Is it just me or does that look painful and unnecessary? 
I think it's a decent distro. I'm using it now, but I don't think that it's the end-all to Linux. I like the fact that it's  Debian-based and use spt as its package manager, although rpm has improved considerably over the years. After using Linux for a while, I keep coming back to *BSD. That's probably what I like best in Unix-land--there's lots of choices.
Mish is saying that while prices of most goods are going up, housing is going down. And he says there's a limit to what the fed can do. Money supply in the form of derivatives is in the trillions whereas when it comes to the fed they have billions and that is shrinking. In fact fed reserves have been cut in half since last year. At some point reserves go to $0.0 and there's nothing much they can do except printing money(treasury bills to finance govt budget deficit), but even then they can't print fast enough to replace the money that is lost.   But let's say they print our way to prosperity, who gets the money? The ones who get it first will do well while everyone else suffers(inflation). Money supply should only grow slowly, growing too quickly results in a lot of inflation pain as we are seeing right now. Farmers and exporters are doing well, anyone dealing with international trade is doing well, while Americans who can't directly benefit from a weak dollar feel pain at the pump, at the grocery store.
What if ? Hollywood would have immense material at their disposal. 
Was that a tentacle?
Yes, but that statement didn't exactly express the inner angst I feel right now towards the economic situation, so I spiced it up. 
I'm a Ron Paul supporter, but I don't think it's fair to vote you down. He is somewhat responsible for those letters. He did make [good money off them](http://www.reason.com/news/show/124426.html), so I think greed may have been the motive.
Dublin Dr. Pepper, bottled in Dublin, TX.  It's all over the place in DFW and a few other large cities.  I think it has a creamier taste, but I also enjoy it because it comes in a glass bottle, which is something I miss about childhood sodas.
Victoria Lindsay has removed all photos of herself on her MySpace page. Victoria, or Tori, as she was referred to by her mother, is the Lakeland, Florida, 16-year-old cheerleader, who was beaten by six of her classmates from Mulberry High so they could post a video of the beating on YouTube and MySpace.
lol n1...   Truth is though I believe this is at least part of the reason Blue Ray spanked HD-DVD - because it had a cooler name...   
Actually, he did do something. When trying to take down a system, social engineering is something that many people will use as an attack vector.   Therefore, this avenue had to be explored and tested. The company's security failed. 
Both, perhaps?
Right on.
How about a new foreign (and domestic, for that matter) policy that doesn't wreck the U.S. dollar? How about fuel efficiency requirements so that we aren't so affected by the price of gas when it goes up? How about not being dependent on a fuel source that comes from countries we don't get along with?  The list goes on...
I view the comments in Ron Paul's newsletter as a tacit endorsement of David Duke.  The fact that David Duke endorsed Ron Paul in this current election cycle is not what I'm taking issue with.  I would say that Ron Paul's fulminations about the "coming race war" and exhortations to white people to arm themselves come pretty close to advocating violence, but I'll grant you that. He's just a plain-stupid racist.
Hillary is stating publicly that her true allegiance is to the ultra-Zionists. Not the Democratic Party, Not the USA, Not anyone.  She is literally a traitor, because ultra-Zionists are traitors.  Myself and many others have zero tolerance for Zionist traitors at this point in our country.  Let's not allow them to influence any more of our elections and steal our resources. ZERO TOLERANCE FOR ZIONISTS!  ZTZ  ZTZ  ZERO TOLERANCE FOR ZIONISTS!
First they blamed on the sailors aboard the ship. Remember that? They actually blamed our service members saying they had made the banner and put it up without administration knowledge until someone had the guts to ask the sailors who said that the Bush Administration had made the banner and ordered them to put it up. But admitting any mistake is a first for this administration. I'm looking out my window right now checking on those flying pigs and feeling the floor to see if Hell has frozen over. Fortunately, Perino, Bush’s spokeswoman, used weasel words that he wasn't specific enough so Hell is back to its original temperature and the flying pigs have gone back to the farm.   
This is a perfect example of the transformation involved in making a model. Now just imagine the rest of those models sitting next to you in a park.
You win.
How else are you going to find it?
Wow... you Obama-zombies are not sounding like paranoid delusional morons at all...  Not at all.
&gt;Yeah but Ron Paul, a white dude and a doctor had it all. And he's much angrier than Obama. Obama is like: let's change the wallpaper when the whole house is falling.  Yes, and Obama is likely going to be our next president while Ron Paul will continue to waste Congressional time introducing bills that have no chance of passing.  It's a little thing called realism versus idealism. You can think you are right as much as you want, it doesn't do you much good unless you convince others to support you.
Well, I think the bigger connection might be that Ron Paul supporters are buying his book. 
must slipped their mind while they were getting gay married.  I know, this is a 2 year delayed reply,but hey... still fun
You can tell by the pixels.
This is fucked up is all that I have to say.  All of you guys check out a documentary called "Orwell Rolls in his Grave" it is about this very thing.
Exactly! I need proof of souls in general.
Yep, can't compile dynamic languages. _Everybody_ knows that.  Edit: forgot the sarcasm tags.
Haha, great picture, the Burj Dubai interests me alot...  But the curve of the earth? its called fish eye lens.
Hehehe, the last games shown - Portugal vs. Netherlands - kind of reminds me the last real one, with the fouls and the red cards :D  Still, incredible footage, amazing game.
You know why I say things that other people don't say? Because I'm not a little lamb who believes everything the mob says.  So your little tease is something I can take in stride. Even humor! We people who think for ourselves are used to it.
I'm not blaming Obama, but something tells me Petraues and the "surge success" is going to come into play. 
&gt; My judgement is just fine. I don't think that's for you to say. &gt;  We aren't electing a scientist at the NIH or president of the NAACP You're prepared to elect an avowed racist, a scientifically and economically ignorant dweeb to the most powerful and most dangerous job in the world, mostly because he agrees with you about neo-isolationism and cannabis decriminalisation. Oh yes, how could anyone question your judgement? &gt; we're electing the commander in chief of America. Well, no you're not, in fact, you've just been wasting your time and everyone else's with a lame-duck candidate. 
Lol, superstition is funny.
If you don't any already, you're screwed. To consider yourself job-worthy you should really know at least HTML, CSS, and Javascript. If you want to be a "web programmer" you will need at least one other language, likely: Java, PHP, Python, Ruby, or C# (ASP.NET).  Most importantly, you will need to be proficient in one written human language. Since you're here: likely English.  So, at a minimum you're talking five: English, HTML, CSS, Javascript, and &lt;back-end language&gt;. If that sounds like too many for you, consider another programming specialization. The web is a multi-language domain. Expect to learn a new language or framework every year or so just to stay current.
Because it has 'breaking' in the title. 
Trumped! So how is this new then?
And Senator Hart is [only 1 of many high-level officials who warn of fake terror](http://georgewashington2.blogspot.com/2008/04/high-level-officials-warns-of-fake.html).
NSFW.REDDIT.COM
Could we also maybe get a link to some cute pictures of ponies, and maybe an update on that one leukemia kid that's in so many films that never seems to die but is always about to?  I'd also like to get a link to some other myspaces ThAt ArE CaPiTaLiZeD iN A MoRe fUcKeD uP mAnNeR tHaN kIdNaPpErRs RaNsOm nOtEs cOmPoSeD oF NeWsPaPeR AnD mAgAzInE ClIpPiNgS!!!!1
"One in a million shot, doc..."
not all dreams can come true.
If you grow something else, where you could instead grow food, you are still reducing the food supply.  Norman Bolaug said "the long-term solution will be cellulosic ethanol made from forest industry byproducts and products" and until someone says something *very compelling* to the contrary, I will assume that all other biofuels are bunk.
&gt;I've given you two reasons in my first post to you. One: providing for the general welfare. Two: defense  Congress can only provide for the general welfare and common defense within the confines of the powers delegated to it by Article I Section 8.  &gt;I'm sorry, but your viewpoints are out of sync with modern day interpretation of both government and the constitution.   That's because modern day interpretations are out of sync with the constitution. Congress has been passing unconstitutional legislation for so long that nobody questions it anymore.  &gt;Your opinions are also out of sync with the general population and the people, who support federal funding of the sciences.  The general population is also politically ignorant.
on that guy, it looked necessary. ...what a tinky-winky!
WAKE UP SHEEPLE!!!!!
Ugh I h8 CCDs.  CLIMATE CHANGE DENIERS
I'm already seriously overcommitted, headed into the busiest time of the year. But many other people are already working on this issue -- MediaMatters is just one node. Keep looking into *organizations* that are already doing media reform work, and join oneor more of them. There's really no need to be reinventing the wheel when so much is already underway.  I wish you much patience and endless good luck with whatever part of it you choose to pursue! 
correct.
So THAT'S why they said Saddam had WMD.
I think that is her point.  Girls are trained to require something other than simple reciprocation in exchange for sex.  Boys are trained that they have to "pay" for sex in some way.
Bacon is tasty! Um...even more so when it's eaten upside-down! Seriously, that trend *is* annoying, but the reply came at around the same time as the OP...while Yst could've been near the top of the comments then, he wouldn't have had 'lots of points'.
So... when I'm about 30, I'm going to systematically begin damaging and/or removing every part of my body and then grow it back. THAT way, I'll be immortal.
Thank you for reminding me why I am a Libertarian. 
&gt; hideous ambulatory lutefisk monster embrace  Not a Java fan?
No it's just a really bad showing and almost total lack of support. 
Fuck parties.  We need unity as a whole country.  I really hope he can bring the change necessary to keep this country alive.
No, they pay the banks.
&gt;In advocating a free market in roads, on one level, we shall be merely arguing that there is nothing unique about transportation; that the economic principles we accept as a matter of course in practically every other arena of human experience are applicable here too. Or at the very least, we cannot suppose that ordinary economic laws are not apropos in road transportation until after the matter has been considered in some detail.
Damn it.
Well, in the Microsoft website, they state that "both Team System and SourceSafe are good choices". That made me not want to touch Team System. If they're really comparing VSS with Team System and "both are good choices", I'm not touching Team System with a 10-foot pole.
Eternal sunshine of the spotless mind. That stuff is too depressing, just don't talk about it...
What is WATB?
Technically speaking, what kind of error would that be? (Where obviously the previous release's announcement had "22nd" and "23rd", and then it was updated for this release, but the modifiers were assumed constant and left untouched.)  Couldn't really call it a refactoring error. Is there a specific term?
gross
Re-read all my posts carefully you will not have any problems.   I am not pro Palestine and  Pro Israel. I don't think you can state that you are. Therefore, I don't have the luxuary of time as you do to sit and rant, however, I highly suggest you re-read the above and consult Karen Armstrong on the relationship of Muslims Jews and Christians.   Thanks for a wonderful session.
That wasn't on the script. 
No one. The people responsible for the system, like the system just the way it is. Pigs at the trough. Time to go 1776 (Or more appropriately 1789) on their arses. Unfortunately there isn't enough 'pain' for this to be popular yet, but it's coming.
It's still April. By June when he has the nomination, this period will be looked back as his "vetting" period.
The answer probably lies in fixing the culture rather than trying to go against your sexual orientation. Believe me, honey, THAT doesn't work. 
In Soviet Russia, Mud falls in you
Just picked it up today. Great read so far. :)
Damn. My Girlfriend has been lying to me.  (Either that or somebody pulled the rug over her eyes)
Well, you can't win 'em all, i guess.
Don't know why you were downmodded, maybe for a slight lack of clarity - I call *fiction*. This is almost certainly another made-up story from dailywtf. 
Fewer questions = even more selection (of who's doing the questioning) and bias than we have now  The system we have is built to ensure that, unless there is a complete breakdown of the MSM and gross collusion between the White House and the MSM, the President will be asked a wide variety of questions and will be effectively grilled.  The problem is that said breakdown has occurred.  Solve the root of the problem.  Not the symptoms.
Just for future reference, you can direct someone to the part of the article like this.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Salvia_divinorum#Opinions_and_arguments
Perhaps our fully developed agro-business is why we have food and they don't?   Don't be so quick to bite the hand that feeds you.
the rate was cut to +2.00%, not -0.25% as your headline states.
I wouldn't kill them, but I would go take my child back at gunpoint and disappear.  Which would absolutely suck ass...but for my kid...
How so, Social Security is theft from the populace, as were most of the make work programs and they are what lead to the average american to expect the nanny state big government to take care of him/her.  You can argue the point that those are good things - I would take the other side that personal responsibility is required to be a free people, and he took the choice away from  us and created the atmosphere that we live in today.  He also played a crucial role in getting us into the UN, something that I personally feel created a second government to abide by and will be used as a tool to create a single global government for the betterment of the elites while trampling on the common citizen.
*shudders* I'd rather not choke that down.
A nice excuse to sell some new text books where 95% of the info is old and 5% is just awesome.
Can you give me the lowdown on what your theory for the events of 9/11 is? Being as though you seem to doubt the prevailing theory.  I was at a lecture last night given by some physicist, and a student (I'm on a college campus) asked about the official theory and challenged it. He gave a reasonable response.  Even so, it sort of perked my interest. I'd love to hear your thoughts.
The article lost me at No Child Left Behind. More fucking testing. Colleges DO test when the students come in....they are called PLACEMENT tests. More and more students are placed in REMIDIAL classes because they haven't mastered the basics.  I totally agree with squid...you DON"T have to go to college. Colleges are te ones pushing EVERYONE to go. 
AMAZING!!!
A hatchet job masquerading as journalism.  If it is not already evident, I think the quotes below from previous columns by the writer clearly expose his bias.  From [FLOSSing with jargon](http://www.interopnews.com/news/flossing-with-jargon.html):  &gt; Later on, realizing that the despised "open source" was not going away, the free/libre partisans and their politically correct allies annexed the enemy term to their own and coined the lexicological monster "free/libre open source software" along with its ludicrous acronym FLOSS.  ~ &gt; What's corrupt about Stallman's moral sloganeering is that he condemns the pursuit of self-interest by others in order to promote his own equally self-interested goal of replacing the free market by some kind of high-minded collectivism.  ~ &gt; It is only a short step from "should not exist" to "must not be allowed to exist." Instead of dismissing Stallman as a crank, it's time for the open source community to take his totalitarian ideas more seriously and to reject them categorically.  From [Do we want Europe regulating our software?](http://www.interopnews.com/news/do-we-want-europe-regulating-our-software.html):  &gt; By forcing Microsoft to offer an unbundled version of Windows in Europe, the EU believes that it has increased consumer choice. Personally, having already made the choice to purchase Windows, I would just as soon have my media viewing habits subsidized by the putative monopolists in Redmond than put up with Real's annoying pop-up ads.  ~ &gt; The EU looks at this normal market behavior and sees something pathological that needs reprimanding. The EU sees Microsoft doing everything it can to steer customers its way and decides that we consumers need protection lest we fall into the clutches of the evil monopolist, as if we were children.  From [Has open source jumped the shark?](http://www.interopnews.com/news/has-open-source-jumped-the-shark.html):  &gt; In the dreary conventional view of economics shared by Richard Stallman's side of the open source world and some of his pundit fans, profits are akin to global warming: both are evil. By this logic, common corporate strategies for achieving profits - such as building a better mousetrap, making your brand a household name, or trying to keep the recipe to your secret sauce a secret - are inherently wrong. You see, it's just plain wicked for software developers to go out and create really useful solutions to a really hard problems, and then have the nerve to keep them secret so they can charge people money.  * Edit: insertion of tildes(~) to break up quotes.
just going through it now, seems like a pretty good text.
Yeah he was wrong.  "All we need is love" *derisive snort*
WWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWAKE UP SHEEPLE
Lovely headline but my airport is Los Angeles International. So I doubt it.
In the Dick joke thread?
As far as I can tell, he hasn't advocated a new foreign policy, aside from ending Iraq. He is perfectly alright with invading or bombing other countries, as long as we think about it first...
What -- you believe those stories about dirty fucking hippies (DFHs)? There's a long, proud tradition of effective protest in this country -- it's just that you've been taught to not recognize it or respect it.  Making protests work requires a willingness to take more heat than merely being labelled crazy. When it really gets cooking, you have to expect COINTELPRO, at least. I'm happy to report that this doesn't scare off as many people as you might think.  So, ya ready to become a crazy nut? 
Because the only thing Reddit hates more than Jews is Americans.
And these are the barbarians that America's sons and daughters are dying for? Religion of peace my ass!
FTA:  &gt; "'My concern is [the boy] could have immense difficulty, particularly in the early stages of his development, in reconciling all the complicated adult relationships in his life. In the interests of [the boy's] stability, it is best that he have intermittent exposure to [the biological father], rather than structured continuous access,'  See, this is what gets me. If we're talking about a father, we're all oooohhhh soooo concerned for the infants well being. So much so it's important to not 'confuse' the baby by allowing access by the biological father.   But it's ok to strap an infant boy to a board and carve off his genitals while he screams in terror, agony, and horror. Vomiting or passing out from the pain. Traumatized for life, parent-son bonds vaporized, loss of ability to closely bond with or trust others for his entire life.  The dissonance is as wide as the grand canyon.
You are a bad troll. 
Do you think it is a bad idea to own stock?  You said "they pretty much fuckin' have to now", kind of implying that they were better off before when only 20% owned stock.  You may want to rethink your premise.  By the way, my comment didn't credit Reagan with the stock holding increase, it set a time frame.
fail english recently?
Whereas you entertain guests with fascinating facts about Hitler's dietary habits?
&gt;It's funny how you folks always want to focus on the welfare clause when the majority of my post is based in the military argument  If the money spent does not directly benefit the military it's unconstitutional.  &gt;and the right of the people.  The will of the people cannot violate the constitution unless properly amended.  &gt;Furthermore, the founding fathers could never envision modern times and the modern social/political/global landscape.  That's why the constitution has an amendment process.  &gt;Are we supposed to just let disease wipe us all out because of a 200 year old non-distinct clause on a piece of paper?   That sort of misguided view is how our rights are being taken away in the name of terrorism.  The amendment process exists in the constitution for a reason.
That is completely fallacious. What you describe would increase the price of gasoline, because it would destroy the human resources available to pull that oil out of the ground.  After all that oil were annexed by the US, it would not then be distributed to Americans for free. In a year or so, when it was actually being pumped again, it would be sold at market rates.  So I realize you were sortof being facetious, in that you do not advocate gassing the Middle East, but your point is incorrect as well.
As a European, I don't know what a polygrapher is. Ostensibly it's an oracle who knows if the interrogated person lies or not.
The massiveness of this really can't be emphasized enough.  This kind of development makes Ray Kurzweil's brand of exponential lunacy about The Singularity almost believable.  The potential implications are just staggering.
&gt;This came after years of continued attacks, terrorism and assassination attempts all from the the US  I think that's what the parent meant with "encourage the people of oppressive governments to rise against their government".
Even human to human organ transplants are subject to graft-versus-host disease. The chance of a 6/6 HLA match with a human chimp hybrid is that's even possible are really slim. Even with matched organs you still might have a rejection. The solution to the organ shortage is cloning not humanzees.
If they were reasonable they wouldn't be dictators.
Ok, when I wrote that I really didn't mean it to be offensive.  But now, after reading your comment I can see your point.  A few months ago there was a thread here where it asked the age of all responders.  I was amazed at how young everyone here seems to be.  That has affected the way I respond to comments here. I guess I did start thinking about everyone here as kids.  I will try to do better in the future, but for now could you please get off my lawn?
_Judge Almand later used the baby’s inappropriate removal to justify making the separation permanent, saying it would be too “traumatic” to return Sabrina to her natural parents_  Judges decision: http://s189.photobucket.com/albums/z84/CattyNancy/Sabrinas%20folder/?action=view&amp;current=JamesAlmanddecision1.jpg  http://www.ourstory.com/thread.html?t=250376  Hon James F. Almand  Arlington Circuit Court 1425 North Courthouse Road Arlington, VA 22201
Who created the music?
Hey, if Paul really isn't a racist, why did he publish the racist, paranoid filth he published, over the course of two decades, and why does he employ Lew Rockwell?  Ron Paul's support among black voters is not, I think, what you imagine it to be. In fact, I rather think you made that up.  The constant depiction of ending the war on drugs as a sop to black people just demonstrates how massively, and offensively, out of touch with reality the pushy, shrill Ron Paul fanboys are.
never said it wasn't decent. i am saying it isn't the end-all be-all finally replace windows distro. it is trendy, that's all. next year something else will come along and everyone will talk about that.  how are the *BSDs doing? i haven't honestly installed/used one in quite awhile.
REDRUM... REDRUM...
You're completely off your rocker. In the US, people go to prison for that. More importantly, culture is not defined by what one or a few people do.   Your attempt to use "culture" as an excuse for rape and murder is sickening.
During the war, Germany got two hundred scientists to sign a petition declaring relativity was wrong. Einstein retorted, "it takes only one person to prove me wrong."  Science does not operate on consensus, rather politics does. In fact, the power of the careful accumulation of evidence and analysis is the foundation of modern science.  The consequences of the anthropogenic release of CO2 and other greenhouse gases into the atmosphere is not an issue to take lightly. However, global warming has long been swept in by environmental extremists and politicians as a political dispute rather than a scientific dispute. As long as global warming is approached from the black and white consensus mindset, it'll be difficult if not impossible to come to an intelligent conclusion regarding global warming.  Any climate scientist worth a damn will refuse to conclude that we have any scientific degree of certainty that the planet will face disaster given the current CO2 output. The scientific study of climate, in a sense predicting the weather a hundred years or more in advance, is notoriously difficult, complicated by uncertainties and nonlinearities.  There is nothing wrong with encouraging better environmental protections or discouraging CO2 emissions on any front. However, using pseudoscientific extremism to support your political movement is dishonest and harmful to real science. Regretfully, in climate science this has become the norm.  Polluted by the political mindset, objectivity has been flushed to the point that it's hard for any layman to realize that most climate scientists cannot tell you a damned thing about the climate in 20, 50, or 100 years. Especially in the terms of certain doom or catastrophe.
Because he hates america, obviously.
I don't have a car, so...
&gt; Nothing can be done. If it could, it would have been done. I see you've internalized the one lesson your masters really insisted you absorb. Good student!
Please.  
Xenu
7 years of practice will do that...
Credit cards? I thought they used gold ;)
Okay, they can have she-male Ann Coulter and we'll take Jessica Simpson. Deal.
I find great irony in the fact that there have always been women in my life who wanted to have sex with me. I'm just the Forbidden Fruit, I suppose. 
Yay!  I voted for her 10 years ago when I was a freshman at UCSB.
I hear you on that, he's not as bad as Giuliani by far.  But that would be like saying McCain would be a great president, because at least he's not Bush.
It does kind of sound sarcastic. Also kind of sounds like he played it. I don't actually know if he did or not.   "Wondering why there's such frothing demand for a "murder simulator""  When he puts the quotes around "murder simulator" it actually implies, in my mind, that he doesn't think it is and is in fact rubbing it in the face of those that think it is. 
Still, even with all that shit, I would take Ron over all the other republican candidates. I don't deny it was on those letters and that he made money from them, I just don't care enough to not endorse him.
I would argue that science can't build a dyson sphere around [VY Canis Majoris](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/VY_Canis_Majoris) but then again, I may be underestimating what eventually will be possible.
Impressive, though buggy as hell on my Safari. Also, would be nice if enemies, like, shot at you or something. And I miss the dogs :(
Um, no, idiot, take your conspiracy theories and go find a troofer story to unload in.  This is discussing a specific very public constituency that has anti-American goals that should not be allowed, just like we don't allow money to be raised to go to Hamas.
“I want to stop the Salvia divinorum dealers who are pushing young people to experiment with a potentially dangerous substance.”[51]  OH MY GOD WHAT THE FUCK IS WRONG WITH THESE PEOPLE?  This is just a taste of the plethora of fucking retarded quotes you will read.
Wow, check out the massive spike on "sex" searches in India, haha....
Yeah, and this is the culture Jimmy Carter and Barak Obama want to kiss up to.  And the left-wing is right in a goofed up sense:  A society gets the kind of government it deserves...but then, back when the world was larger we could let this insanity run around 'over there' and not concern ourselves too much...now those stone-age idiots have figured out how to create nukes - and it isn't so simple anymore.
The solution involves figuring out how to get past the glaze. Lamenting it without addressing it adds to the problem. Folks who really care about change have to learn to change all sorts of people's thinking. Might as well start practicing where you are right now.
Notice how Olbermann and Obama both start with **O**? Coincidence?
&gt; the gold standard is a bad idea  If you like inflation. Why is a gold standard a bad idea? I'd say it's a lot better than the current fiat currencies backed by nothing.  Allowing competing currencies (ie. the government not deciding what kind of currency people use) is better than forcing people to use a gold standard though.
I'm not a fan of the whole Hydrogen bombing volcanoes thing though
Thats funny because the Muslims here in America don't beat the fuck out of their wives for going to the supermarket with out their face cover. It's more cultural than religion.  This is why I hate people who are ignorant to the differences between religion and culture.
Suprisingly exciting game today. Chelsea didn't play anti-football for once.  I'd give Chelsea the advantage, but Man U will probably have more support amongst the neutrals in the crowd if Chelsea play their usual boring as fuck football.
Even Ann Coulter hit the Amazon #1 spot.  All that proves is that the fanboys and girls come out in droves when their hero puts out a book.  It says nothing else.  http://www.freerepublic.com/focus/f-news/1646015/posts
Ok, I take that back, however  &gt;my x800 gto won't cut it  http://www.crysis-online.com/Information/System%20Requirements/  He's saying 'it won't cut it', not that he's ever tried it.  In all fairness though an x800 GTO is a gimped x800 and performs like a 6600GT. You can buy a modern computer for about $800 that could run Crysis.
no, the 1400 foot tall building that collapsed onto it was
I understand where you are coming from now. Thanks for taking the time to reply.   And it wasnt the semi-colon. You are very clear and concise. Pointing out the semi-colon just made the most sense at the time. 
Hagee is such a trip. He has the demeanor of Baron Harkonen and a body to match.
The man shouldn't have brought the fucking country back from a crippling depression - that isn't in the job description.  Consolidating power at the Federal level was and is a bad thing.  His actions are why the 10th Amendment means jack shit today and the Feds will kill you for doing something that is legal in your state. His actions are why the average American worker sees half of his wages gone by taxation.  History books are written by the winners - there were plenty of other ways this country could have been brought back from the depression created by a few large banks to allow them to buy up small competitors for pennies on the dollar (which we see being repeated today, but fucking idiots who love sucking off the tit of mommy gov't don't like to learn from history) and created the massive Military Industrial Complex that has killed BILLIONS for greed since his terms.  Fuck that asshole, I know that Reddit leans democrat, I know that Reddit leans liberal, and he is a fucking God to most people that read this - but he did not uphold his oath to the constitution, and worked as basically king for 2 decades to completely change the governance of this nation, and the chickens are finally coming home to roost and you and your children are the ones holding the bag.
very cool - thanks
*sigh* do you Ronulans have any other nouns in your vocabulary? Perhaps gadfly, malcontent, contestaire, or even - dare we suppose - merely someone with the courage to express the unpopular opinion as a token for the sake of saving the web from the threat of Bolshevism?  P.S. For a group who worships the legendary "Dr. No", you sure don't like other people who stand against the mob mentality.
I can't believe it's tongue and hair survived while the rest of it's body was charred beyond recognition.
&gt;If you honestly feel that the ends justify the means, then you are part of the problem. If the West does not retain its hegemony, others will expand. All other major civilisations are barbarous and/or despotic. Draw what conclusions you will.
Number of civilians dead? Ooops, hardly any?  Then Israel attacks, kills how many innocent people and then is like 'oh, sorry.... see they were totally firing rockets from on top of hospitals and stuff, we promise... yes, really... what, you want proof? Oh, you should take our word for it'.
Like all empires, the US one is about to end. Now the strong Euro will probably replace the American dollar as global trade currency.
Haha, nah, I was poking fun at you for offering me advice not in person.   But yeah, I dig media matters. I forget the other site I like, maybe, center for public policy. the guy got fired form 60 minutes and started it up. 
The model sister doesn't exactly look pleased during the hug.
First of all, it was a figurative "fuck off." Secondly, you must have never worked in retail. Why would he give a shit about what they found? They paid money and received a product. If he said, "Oh, thanks for telling me! I'll go check the rest of the toys for drug paraphernalia." What do you think would have happened then? Their suspicions would have been confirmed and a lawsuit may follow. By keeping quiet, they are cloaked in doubt. But then, confirming their suspicions makes shit loads of sense too. Why didn't I think of that? 
Thanks, neocon-imator. You have proven my point nicely.
&gt; tax dollars were used to transport prostitutes rather than protect someone on a dangerous mission   Uh... what the hell do you think Air Force One's primary mission is?
&gt;Re-read all my posts carefully you will not have any problems.  Ditto.  &gt;I am not pro Palestine and Pro Israel. I don't think you can state that you are.  I suspect I am more pro-Palestinian than the leadership they have had for the last several decades. I would not have stolen billions and used the rest of the aid for weapons.  &gt;I highly suggest you re-read  Several times you asked me to check my facts, I did then gave you links. You seem to ignore facts, so checking them won't help.
He was asked this explicity in his Fox News interview quite recently. His answer was that as president he would set the mission and that as president Petraues' mission would change to withdrawal.
You're a moron, aren't you?
Ann Coulter hit the Amazon #1 spot as well.  All this proves is that the fanboys and girls come out in droves when their hero publishes a book.  http://www.freerepublic.com/focus/f-news/1646015/posts  edit: it says nothing about wide spread support.
When One Man Has Way Too Many Balls.
Is it still dog-slow?
Great job
just like you've been programmed to.
And now it seems like every other car I see is a Prius.
mainstream media
Alternative fuels then begin to make much more economic sense. Oil companies lose.
&gt; Up until today, the circuit element had only been described in a series of mathematical equations written by Leon Chua, who in 1971 was an engineering student studying non-linear circuits. Chua knew the circuit element should exist -- he even accurately outlined its properties and how it would work.  Oh yeah, so was he a prophet or what?
YEs we can, because torture is not punishment according to Scalia.
Yeah damn, I have it saved on my  tab of things to read. 
That's true.  Especially when something has a long production period as in farming, it's possible for a large producer to cause problems in the short term until someone else can start producing to sell to those the big guy was abusing.  The trouble with when a government is the big organization is that it will physically try to prevent anyone from competing with their service on their "territory".  That abuse can last as long as the government can enforce it's right to do it.  The big business, though, can be brought down by simply not dealing with it.  While that might not always be very easy, it's always easier than deliberately making a government stop enforcing it's own monopoly in some area.  The government is good for some things, but most things I think are safer left to private people.  Again, though, I agree that in both cases we should not be complacent and keep watchful.
This wreaks of cult.
Well it's an analog of the capacitor.  The voltage across a capacitor is proportional to the total amount of current that has been passed through it, in both directions.  Same here, except it's the resistance that varies, not the voltage.  Presumably there will be some limit after which it breaks down, and presumably there will also be some "leakage" returning it towards the normal state over time.
That's always been his position AFAIK. The gold standard is just one option that he believes is the best.
Tazers are not punishment either. I say use some tazers.
gotchoo again, nixon.
I'll admit i didn't take the time to read the article but i don't see why the golf of tonkin is news, We even learned in history class that it was created to build up the war, the incident lead congress to give a blank check pretty much toward the war.
this anonymous snitching business bothers me a lot. Doesn't the constitution provide that we have the right to confront our accusers in criminal trials? If this happened to me I'd want to confront them and exonerate myself ASAP
Owing beyond what was withheld, or in total?
Very important story.
Your English is improving.  Those lessons are paying off.
It's OK if he's bombastic and he's damning America, as long as he's not black and he's not criticizing Israel...
Speaking of which: May sweeps started on Monday, so the news agenda for the rest of the month will be even more skewed toward sensationalism than usual, if that's possible. This is one of the four periods each year when rating determine ad rates, so they want as many eyeballs as possible. This doesn't mean you shouldn't watch, but it does mean it's a better than average time to complain about content *to the network news division*. The source for the above linked story, MediaMatters.org, has comprehensive links for doing just this, and suggestions for effective complaining.
Downvote me all you like. When you are finished, go practice parking.
It tastes different because they probably don't add nicotine and other additives to the tobacco to get you more addicted. It's probably just cured tobacco.
ohms/coulomb?
convince religious fanatics?
Well. First you have to impeach Cheney. Congress isn't interested in this. Through wiretaps done by the NSA, they own enough dirt on a majority of the members of Congress that I'm sure words have been had with Pelosi and Reid to the effect "If you take us down, we're taking you with us". You're going to have to do it yourselves. But again, the current pain isn't sufficient to make the sacrifice.
&gt;* Uncontrollable laughter * Past memories, such as revisiting places from childhood memory * Sensations of motion, or being pulled or twisted by forces * Visions of membranes, films and various two-dimensional surfaces * Merging with or becoming objects * Overlapping realities, such as the perception of being in several locations at once  Oh, yes, sounds completely harmless.  We should all take salvia and get our minds blown.  Sounds like we'd all be more productive citizens if we sat around and hallucinated about how interconnected we were with to that pizza slice over on the table there.  &lt;/sarc&gt;
Although I find it funny that couples who do it more than once a week are "sex maniacs".
I think it's a great idea.  It's something I've thought about too.
Criticizing Obama, especially now, at a time where Clinton, McCain and the media seem to be ganging up on him, is not an easy thing for me to do, but Obama may have dug his own hole with the Rev. Wright and while he is doing a decent job of climbing out he has still not fully recovered from the Rev. Wright fall.
Thank the war in Iraq.  After Vietnam, a certain non-zero number of vets turned out to be psychopaths who'd like to go out hunting from time to time.  Imagine, you train people to kill and strip them of social scruples, and they retain that mentality on discharge.  Well, guess what everyone, it's happening again.
Dyncorp isn't the problem, it's the subsidiary [Yoyodyne](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Yoyodyne) that you have watch out for.
By that definition tazers are punishment. But how can police have been applying punishment without a jury of peers having made a verdict?
Now picture you're a traumatized rape victim and the government says you have to have the procedure whether you want it or not.
I see nothing wrong with that ad. But to be safe I will ask my parole officer if he sees anything wrong with it.
That's his new story. When this originally came out, he defended the remarks in the newsletters and didn't deny writing them (and thus effectively stood on a racist platform during the election campaign he was running at the time). I don't know who wrote those newsletters, but whether or not it was RP, I find his defense of the comments in those newsletters pretty indefensible. If this was any other candidate, there'd be no debate over this.  _edit_: His original defense of the newsletters is quoted in a Houston Chronicle article from 96, which no longer seems to be available on the Chronicle website (but it was available a few months ago). If you [google](http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;rls=org.mozilla%3Aen-US%3Aofficial&amp;hs=Ou2&amp;q=%22in+the+context+of%22+ron+paul+houston&amp;btnG=Search) for "'in the context' ron paul houston" you will find a bunch of references to the relevant portions of the article.  _edit2_: Here's the [article](http://www.chron.com/CDA/archives/archive.mpl?id=1996_1343749).
I believe not electing a scientist is what is screwing us over these days.
even Ron Paul isn't against roads... and yes, the Constitution allows for the federal government to regulate interstate commerce, which includes navigation and transport.
that's a lame date, man
You can get a loan without a credit score... plenty of people have done it.  You just choose to buy into credit... it's your life, live it as you wish but don't belittle those that understand that credit isn't a mathematical exercise, it's a psychological exercise.  People that use electronic forms of payment spend more on average per shopping trip than those that pay with cash.
That 1 star review is no longer there. Hmm.
&gt;I think it's safe to say that Ubuntu wouldn't be where it is without the force of Canonical  I'd be about where Debian is, and it would be called "Debian".  Ubuntu would never exist as we know it without Debian.
actually, i think that torture can be a form of punishment. think about it, who are the only people we torture? the prisoners. as soon as they are taken captive and held against their will, they are being punished for their actions. anything the government does to them is a form of punishment, which now includes torture.  this is obviously a political thing for Scalia, not a valid interpretation of the constitution
Williams is part of the criminal corporate mainstream media which has been derelict in the duty to inform the American people and pass on false information to us for years leading us into wars and covering up government corruption. What a surprise. Don't trust the corporate MSM for news unless you're stupid.
I'd prefer if they had to give press passes out to internet media
I'm not sure how you get from here to there.  In the scenario I described, gasoline just got **more profitable** for the producers.  That will encourage more refining and more oil drilling, but it makes a competing product even less competitive (from an investor's point of view).
ok let me simplify the down syndrome example with made up numbers:  let's say that there is a certain part of your cell that gets weaker as you age.  When that part of your cell is too weak it can't properly handle the chromosomes and you end up with a down syndrome baby.  Obviously I am making this up but bear with me.  Ok 20 year old women might have a 1 in 100 chance of having a baby with down syndrome.  that's because most of them have vibrant cell parts.  Ok so every generation 99 of these women do well, but the woman with defective cell parts doesn't succeed.  Ok so there is some evolutionary pressure to weed out the genes that result in the cell part being weak.  Now imagine that woman have children at 30.  Let's say that 10 in 100 have their cell parts defective.  Now there is strong pressure to eliminate those genes from the gene pool.  You see it isn't an all or nothing gene, maybe there are dozens of genes and the more bad ones you have the earlier your cells wear out in that respect.  It is kind of hard to put into words.  Basically, susceptibility to producing babies with Down syndrome at older ages wasn't really selected for or against, as most kids were born earlier.  Now it matters more.  Evolution isn't instantaneous and is filled with twists, turns, and tradeoffs.  Maybe the genes that allow Down syndrome in the first place improve health in some other way.  Maybe they don't, and they are being selected against, but not at a rate at which they will die off anytime soon.  Your contention that everything is "included" rather than selected isn't true.  While most people in modern societies live long lives, they produce children at different rates.  Many produce no children at all.  That is almost the same as dying at birth from an evolutionary perspective.  It is slightly different because you used up some of your parents' resources, and because you could help your other relatives.   Ok let's keep things simple and say that there are only two subcultures.  Let's say that there is fundamentalist Catholic (lots of kids) and urban doctors (few kids).  You could make the point that the funamentalist Catholic culture will expand at the expense of the urban doctors.  However in every generation some of the Catholic kids will become urban doctors.  The question is, which ones?  It isn't chance.  There will be certain genes that make certain choices more likely.  Those genes will influence the number of offspring produced.  After enough generations the urban doctor population won't be a separate population.  It will be considered a mutant variant of the Catholic fundamentalist population with reduced fertility.
edit: I checked the constitution text, do yourself a favor and read it: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sixth_Amendment_to_the_United_States_Constitution#Text
Corporations have have basically filled the shoes of the Baronry in the middle ages.  This is why they fund think tanks and media that undermine government credibility - there's a dynamic between power derived from wealth vs power derived from the populace.  All this libertarian bollocks is playing directly into corporate hands. It's a sustained attack by neo-baronial power on popular mandate.  And loads of web-nerds go along with it because they love neat little formulas - even though there isn't a shred of evidence of it actually working anywhere.
Climbers don't wear bike helmets. This is because bike helmets aren't built to save you from falling rocks, that's just not the type of impact the designers had in mind.
The Ford Expedition is the new affordable housing.  
I am 32. I make $15 per hour.  When my father was 27, in 1980, he went to a printshop to apply for a job. It was basically semi-skilled labor, offset printing. He had no printing experience, no college degree, poor grades in high school, and a history of job-hopping. He was offered the job at $9.00/hour. And his story was typical for a working-class American.  Adjusted for inflation, That $9.00 would be worth about $25/hour today, or, full-time, about $50,000 per year. (And that's using the phony CPI numbers.) In, fact, my dad supported my mom and four children through the 1980s on his pay alone.  What are today's high-school grads looking at when they search for jobs? Today's college grads? An entry level job at $25/hour? Maybe a few.  I know what you libertarians are going to say already. "You need to get a better job." No shit, asshole. That's why I am spending thousands of dollars and borrowing thousands more to reeducate myself and get a better job. Until that one becomes obsolete too. And I can one day, with a degree and years of experience, make almost what my dad did when he was 27.  So, yeah, I'm bitter. And I haven't grown out of it yet.
You've single handedly saved the world.
i really hate articles like this that overexagurate some peoples fear of sex, and I'm betting they're largely written by childless 20something bloggers. You don't want your kids drinking, doing drugs, or having sex, or in ANY way taking risks that can ruin their future, thats why parents don't support such activity. If everyone just ran around Brave-New-World style America would have the same AIDS problem Africa does, among other STDs, which are already as common as 1 in 4 TEEN girls. So how about that girl of yours, do you actually want her going out to fuck someone tonight?
The word lesbian refers, and has referred for quite some time, to sappho (who was born on lesbos) and her love poems; which are directed at both sexes. Her poetry, circa 500BC, is the turning point for the new meaning of "lesbian."  Catullus refers to her many times, famously with catullus 51 (my old latin teacher's favorite of his), which is a sort of translation/adaptation/derivative of one of hers.  She is also the origin of the term "sapphic poetry".   So yes, about 2500. ;)   EDIT: i should clarify that the specific word "lesbian" is probably not nearly as old, however the reputation of the island is.
if you can remember any particular sentence, the exact wording, or even any specific words in the article,  ...hit the google.
I don't think Maxis is spending any prolonged effort in making Urbz. Is there a problem with EA capitalizing on a product thats making profits?   If you remember after the release of BF1942 DiCE released BFVietnam which looked pretty much the same as BF1942 but wasn't given the same sort of critical acclaim. Then came, what was the game calledd? Sorry I forget the name.. oh right, BF2, which totally blew everyone away. Then came BF2142, which was the equivalent of BFVietnam imo.  Anywho, BF: Bad Company doesn't look half bad and I bet BF3 will look even more awesome. Just how it is.   &gt;And Ubisoft continues to fight very hard against EA acquisition and control, because they know better than you do.  errrr, nope, sorry:  &gt;EA has also been criticized for other aggressive business methods like the acquisition of 19.9 percent of shares of its competitor Ubisoft in what was called a "hostile act" by Ubisoft CEO, Yves Guillemot.[25] However, this has not materialized into anything hostile and Guillemot later indicated that a merger with EA was a possibility.  [Wiki](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Electronic_arts#cite_note-Ubisoft_president_.27still_considering.27_EA_acquisition-25)  Sorry sweetheart, you have to try harder =)  I know I'll probably be downmodded since I'm like one of the few gamers who has not jumped in the 'OMG EA TEH EVIL!' bandwagon, I don't think they're evil just because they're big. But, hye, what do I know? I don't hold it against a company for 'exploiting' a franchise for soccer moms.
Do away with the office of the presidency?  You genius, it might just work!
A. you're being too literal.  B. the idea is that if Oklahoma hates civil liberties that much, what *else* will they do, given the chance?
I knew I was going to get downmodded. I would like it if some of those people would explain to me how it's acceptable to have racist writings published under your name, not once or twice, but regularly for a long period of time.  Think if Hillary had done the same thing, it would be #1 on Reddit every other day.
Kosher dogs are available
Um.  I just wrote a really, really long reply and then accidentally deleted it.  Damn.  I don't feel like re-writing it right now.  In short, where did I blame the gov. for pre-existing tribal tensions?  Also, do you believe that a single unified government does not exacerbate tribal conflicts?  Forgive me, I do not follow your logic, please explain.
haha, what?  isn't freedom and liberty the whole point of america?
Actually, losing men is pretty easy.
Come on, I thought he had played for 24 hours without his *character* dying, that would have been impressive.
That and, we should leave the feds out of science questions. 
Bloated?
I thought I'd heard the last of that microcephalic dwarf.
I tried to warn you!
I was expecting to read the story (period) ... but my browsing was interrupted by an ad.  So I begrudgingly skipped it.  And then another ad superimposed itself over the text I was trying to read, so I gave it up and closed the browser window without having read anything.  Could someone with more patience please tell me what this person did that makes him so dumb?  Thanks.
Yeah, because I'm checking reddit instead of working on my science PhD.
Never gonna *let you down*.
Fuck Radiohead. They haven't released a good record since the 90's.
Victoria Lindsay has removed all photos of herself on her MySpace page. Victoria, or Tori, as she was referred to by her mother, is the Lakeland, Florida, 16-year-old cheerleader, who was beaten by six of her classmates from Mulberry High so they could post a video of the beating on YouTube and MySpace.
Her actions are just going to ruin our country, thanks hildawg.
&gt; Why? Because they are illegal and a violation of international law. &gt; What would you suggest for all of the Jewish refugees? How about bulldozing the settlements with the residents inside? That's the way Israel likes to deal with Palestinians. The refugees themselves will be placed in ghettos and oppressed through military occupation. Surely that will be acceptable to all Zionists and Israelis since it will be a page out of their own book.
So instead of discussing whether or not 911 was a false flag attack, you want to argue the law of physics, which you apparently don't even have a rudimentary knowledge of. 
Ahh, you assumed that Iraqis count as more than fractional humans.  God is busy sharpening his knives to torture them for all eternity.  Finite suffering is negligible when compared to infinite suffering.  Sounds unfair I know, but some "perfect" guy ate the wrong fruit.  And some other perfect guy said to follow him and hate your family.  So really, it's all pretty fair and 1/6th human for heretics is charitable. 
Yeah, there's already reports from players that people who used the console command have had their achievements rolled back.
I don't think it's fair to compare his testicles to Lance Armstrong's - I mean come on, the guy had cancer.
USS Mnemonic might be the name of the carrier. I'm sorry, I'm not sure about it, as it's just one of those hard-to-remember ship names.
www.philipweiss.org  In order to understand why she would do this, you need to understand just who is still supporting Hillary, and where her money is coming from.  The truth is she is the preferred candidate for Zionist traitors in our country, especially the rich ones. Philip Weiss covers a lot of these issues and I encourage you to check his words out.  www.philipweiss.org  ZERO TOLERANCE for ZIONISTS!  They hate America.  ZTZ  ZERO TOLERANCE for ZIONISTS!  They hate Democracy.  Zionists are to blame for Iraq, and will be to blame for Iran if we do anything to Iran.  Remember what Hillary said the day of the heavily-Zionist Pennsylvania Primary?  That she would DESTROY Iran! Her loyalty is not to us.  Where did Mark Penn spend years polishing his craft?  Israel.  www.philipweiss.org  -- look in the archives and topics.
I've recently paid money for something that gave me the same outcome....She was well worth it!
What a little weenie. 
Raising the price of a Lexus/Orange Juice/Pop without a coincident rise in worldwide iron/oranges/water is a clear indication of price manipulation and collusion between Lexus dealers/oj bottlers/soft drink makers.
Singularity?!
So, in short, with some time to figure out how to stitch these together properly, we can basically etch neural networks onto silicon with the same density as modern microprocessors, using existing chip fab technology?  I think I just filled the cup.
This is a Machiavellian plot to convince super delegates that they must choose Hillary or face a loss to the republicans when she splits the liberal vote.
What the heck man this should be a top story. Star-wars thought it was awesome to get a robotic replacement, and now we can freakin make a finger grow back better than it was before.
On the main MTV website: http://www.mtv.com/overdrive/?artist=1123&amp;vid=229632  You can view it full screen there.
Some other good McSweeneys dailies:   * [THE ANDOVER GRADE REPORTS OF GEORGE W. BUSH, SENIOR YEAR.](http://www.mcsweeneys.net/2006/8/15barnosky.html)  * [A MEMO TO MY NEW BOYFRIEND RE: CLARIFICATION OF OFFER PURSUANT TO SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION REGULATIONS AND ALSO MY TROUBLE WITH MONOGAMY.](http://www.mcsweeneys.net/2007/3/2dziura.html)  * [THE AMERICANS WHO VOTED FOR GEORGE W. BUSH WISH TO RETURN THEIR TELEVISION.](http://www.mcsweeneys.net/2007/2/6gladstone.html)  * [THE "I'M SORRY I FAILED TO MAKE YOU RICH" LETTER.](http://mcsweeneys.net/2007/1/17kennedy.html)
step 1: re-submit links that are currently on the front page step 2: ??? step 3: profit
&gt;Would you prefer that the minority dictates laws instead of the majority?  I'd prefer that laws be dictated by our Constitution and by our inherent rights of humans.  &gt;that a few individuals get to decide what the vast majority of others do  No. No one is saying ultrasounds should be *forbidden* those who want them. The issue is that those who don't shouldn't have them forced upon them.  &gt;Presumably, in Oklahoma there is a majority that feel that this is a law they want enforced.  Once upon a time, there a majority in Massachussetts that wanted an 80 year old man crushed to death on suspicion of witchcraft.  Mob rule may be your way, but it isn't the American way. The American way is to protect the rights of the individual person.
Yes, because it will definitely slow down the attack dogs going after your server.
You mean the Center for Investigative Reporting, founded by [Lowell Bergman](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lowell_Bergman)? They do good work -- and Bergman just started a scholarship program for investigative reporting, too. I just wish there were any news orgs still *hiring*, let alone retaining and supporting, investigative reporters. Was it just ten years ago that investigative *teams* were considered the fture of news, all over the country? arrrrrggggghhhh!
Oh wow. I forgot about Digg...
I'm having a great day; you keep flogging the same garbage over and over while Nobama proves day after day that he's an empty shell of a candidate.  Some day you'll wake up but in the mean time it sure is funny to watch.
Yeah, 9/11, WAKE UP SHEEPLE!!!!!
Ok, so what if I got a bunch of people together that have the same view?  For example the current and previous presidents both have a lot of people that don't like them.  I bet that I could get 1% of the population who would be willing to kill one and 1% for the other.  If I gathered all of these people together into a geographical area each populated with 3 million people, and I let these populations continue for a few generations what then?  Then next time an unpopular president comes along surely one of these populations would want to kill him.  It  would be a cultural thing.  What then?  Would it be ok or not?
It makes me queasy just looking at those pictures. :P
Good sleuthing. This hack clearly has an exe to grind.
The ones going on sale later this year will meet CARB emissions regulations.
People are hypocrites.   But, I'll say this: It's sad that he had them written under his name, as there is no consequence that he comes out looking good.   However, I don't think the implications preclude him from being president. I trust in his decision making that he wouldn't do anything outright racist while in office, nor do I think his incompetence would extend to the office.   But that's just me.  And yeah, when I was at a rally of his in new Hampshire, one kid flashed me a sweatshirt with a nazi symbol on it. So maybe there was support from there, I don't know. There were supporters of all colors and make up helping out, and I never heard anyone say anything racist. 
only a champion would try to forge, and cash a check for $360Bn
Someone who is going to tell me the truth...I think I'd faint, after eight years of Dick Cheney telling me to go fuck myself...
she looks like a vampire anyway.
Awesome. He's getting specific in his TV ads. Now he must offer specific solutions in all of his stump speeches. That should swing a few voters.
thanks, I would have never thought of that.
Electrical circuits can be described algebraically.  The "prophecy" arose from an implication of the mathematics.   edit: which is, I suppose, just the scribbling of strange runes on paper, and the divining of truth based on their arrangement.  Prophecy indeed :)
He could start about 60000 record companies with that kind of money.
Looks like someone who's had someone serving them their coffee for about the, oh, last 18 years or so.
&gt;Unlike China, we have no business interest in Cuba.   You're right, of course. That is important, and that is the real reason for the embargo or anything else. The problem is when people try to sell *realpolitik* as some kind of principled action.   &gt;extremely close to our borders.  True, geo-politically it's different, even in sheer military terms.  &gt;They have also been aggressive to us in the past  From here we begin to diverge: they were aggressive following complete and brutal hostilisation from the US. Actually, Fidel Castro only turned to the Communist Party after being continuously attacked by the USA, still licking the wounds of losing one of the several Banana Republics that hosted US industry interests.  &gt;We need to continue to encourage the people of oppressive governments to rise against their government.  The same thing applied to the US would be called treason.  &gt;OR the government there can actually get out of the stone age and implement a form of democracy.  Now you're abandoning the purely strategically motivated reasoning for the "human rights" one. I don't know if you think they are complimentary, but IMO they are not. The "democracy" argument is laughable, seeing as the USA was directly responsible for many of the most brutal dictatorships in South America and continues to count *to this day* as allies countries that make Cuba shine in terms of human rights. Even if we discount past actions - since it was during particularly troubled times- these last point stands.  &gt;It is the Cuban government who has been oppressing their own people, and have not offered them a form of self rule.  I find it interesting that you used the term "self rule". It kind of reminds people on how the US used to view Cuba - and other countries: satellites of US interests that could have "self rule", as long as the core options didn't interfere with US sanctioned ones.   I'm not saying that that's how you used the term though. I understand what you're saying, but the USA maintains close military relations with many countries with much worse record.  &gt;And it is the Cuban people who choose to NOT stand up and fight their own government   Now the Cubans are guilty for not fighting against something that you said they should be opposed to? If Cubans elected Castro in internationally supervised elections, woud you still maintain the embargo to punished them for their choice?  &gt;America is not to blame for the conditions there.  America is the world current superpower, and one of the largest economic partners any nation can have. By having an embargo on an island that borders it the USA actually provides good reasons for people to understand any kind of economic difficulty Cuba has, since being isolated in that manner  is something uncommon and an enormous burden.  To say that the USA "isn't responsible" is somewhat true, in the same way that nobody but the USA would be responsible if everyone else in the world stopped trading with the US and generalised famine resulted.  &gt;America is not to blame for the conditions there.  I personally think that the embargo is doing wonders in maintaining a sense of national pride and defiance alive. Heck, it's one of the reasons most of the world sympathises somewhat with Cuba, regardless of political positioning.  &gt;Mod me down for not reflecting the liberal view...sorry.  Didn't vote up nor down.
Damn Japs! I still didn't watch anything like, though.
&gt;Well, I'm a small minority of one individual....I say that we should all wear our shoes on the wrong feet! Is my minority opinion sufficiently small enough to impose my wishes upon the rest of you?  This is about the stupidist analogy I have seen on reddit. No one is saying that anyone should be forced to do ANYthing. The point is to STOP people from being forced to have an unnecessary medical test. Where did you get the idea that our system of government is designed to allow the rights, life, and property of minorities to be taken away at the whim of the larger culture?
That's a 21% difference, fool.
So they can be rounded up, taken out back, and shot.  I'm a Paul supporter, but come on.
Massive balls = lower center of gravity.
Who does?
Just think about never loosing your change to the sofa!
Add whales to the list of mammals that have been fucked over by BushCo.
This isn't about the report; I haven't read it, and I don't have the engineering background to evaluate it. But, as the page that I linked shows, synthpop's original claim is based on a very selective reading of PNAC's report. Actually reading the source text reveals that the "new Pearl Harbor" would catalyze military use of information technology — *not* an invasion of Iraq.
To me it says you have to treat your people right, and pay them a f**king wage that doesn't have em sabotaging the whole company for basically a 6-pack.  If you can't do that, don't waste whatever money you can squeeze out of your tight ass to install a few widgets that can protect you against the 0.001% chance that anyone would want to hack your retarded website.
OK. Well, see my other post for links to some that I've found amusing, if you're interested in exploring McSweeney's any further.
Then those two aircraft carriers showed up in the gulf just in time!
Not sure what you are saying here.  It appears to me that Global Warming was getting a negative, or perhaps comical, association.  So the same folks that have come up with this new "next decade could be cooler, but global warming still exists - trust us even if the facts don't seem to support us for the next 10 years or more" also decided to call it "climate change" as a new, fresh and untarnished label. At least that is how it seems from the viewpoint of someone who hasn't had a full cup of the Kool-Aid.
Except in Italy, apparently. Kinda ironic.
considering that comments can be sorted by controversy, this makes sense
Any control over scarce resources, the setting of prices deemed 'unfair', or the failure to pay workers 'what they deserve' might be subjectively viewed as economic coercion. It is an ambiguous phrase. It implies that capitalists in general are cheating people out of what is rightfully theirs via 'economic coercion'.  The phrase is some sort of fancy interweb liberty baiting.
You have to admit, this man is dedicated to his cause.
Then I agree.
So you think alcohol should be banned?
&gt;Seems to me that a safer system would be to allow the general public to vote on some laws, thats how in works in North Carolina where I live.  Really? So if the majority decided to vote to forbid Jewish people from owning property or to deny blacks admission to any state university, you really wouldn't see any legal barrier to that, or have any objection to it, so long as it was what most people wanted?
Yeah to reiterate what someone else said - good work Micah! (and everyone else involved) Sounds like Helen is being a good sport about it which is cool :)
[Nope, it was this one](http://www.publicintegrity.org)  Anyways, when I think of investigate team, I think of the corporation documentary, where spend all that money filming the intro clip. Funny stuff.
Goddamn who put the fricking conservatives and their bloody-headed anti-sexuality platform into power in this country. We're looking more like the yanks every day. Gah!  No disrespect to the USA.  &gt; ”Because its highly technical and quite complicated I think that we need an awful lot of public education to make sure young people, fearing they are doing something illegal, don't hide and fail to seek the medical help they need...  Oh great. Wonderful. Yeah. Just peachy.  Internet predators my ass. They're just the convenient excuse to pass this law. If it was up to Harper, he'd probably outlaw sex altogether, re-instate universal male circumcision, instate universal female circumcision, and outlaw happy thoughts for good measure.   Assholes!  &gt; several gay rights groups are not satisfied and have said the law ignores gay men.  &gt; It is currently illegal for Canadians under 18 to have anal sex, meaning two gay or bisexual 17-year-olds who engage in the act could end up in jail   Oh don't worry, I'm sure next we'll be raising the age-of-consent for anal sex to 80. That way nobody can feasibly do it and Harper can sleep at night knowing nobody's willy is up anyone else's ass.   What a waste of legislative time and money.
&gt; 3-yr old arrested for 'criminal mischief'  Yep... that's pretty much all of them.
&gt;Sabrina went to a politically influential local professional couple with no training as foster parents, despite CPS requirements that foster couples be trained before being entrusted with children.
If "tactition" were a word, it'd probably mean something like being especially tactically aware of a situation, or perhaps the quality of something being tactically sound. Something a person can *have*, not something that they can *be*. Perhaps you meant "tactician!"  Engrish are phun.
&gt;The states can do whatever they want during the third trimester (I'm not sure why I wrote first).  I think that's obvious. You have no clue what you're talking about. 
But he wouldn't ever tell Bush to classify him as an Enemy Combatant.
Is that possible?
Fortunately, e^(i * pi) is -1, and perfectly non-imaginary.  Don't try any unit analysis on this, though, if you don't want a headache.
This is disgusting. 
True, and I would remain vigilant so that he wouldn't pull anything, although I think he wouldn't.  Plus, I would risk a president being bad with african americans and science and ending the military industrial complex. That's how important that latter issue is to me. 
I'm positive thats exactly what Clinton is thinking right now.  Fuck presidency, I wanna help them jews.
I don't see an equal lapse of logic on both sides.  I think you're being overly diplomatic.  Granted, there are many passionate atheists, but no more passionate than many theists.  That doesn't mean that atheism is a "religion" and that atheists abandon logic in the process of criticizing paranormal claims.  I don't see any substantive evidence of that.  You can't really play both sides of the fence here.  One side is based on reality and one side is based on fantasy (faith, belief in something that is unproven). &gt;However this is also not a repeatable scientific experiment, but an argument towards a nudge in the probability of the question of theism/atheism.  Au contraire.  Natural selection is a repeatable scientific experiment that can be constantly, continuously observed just about anywhere.
what does the first 1:00 have to do with the 'get out the vote' message in the last 30 secs?
JESUS CHRIST SHUT THE FUCK UP ABOUT THAT DIPSHIT, YOU DUMBASSES  !!12221!!111!!!1ll1ll1!ll1!!l  whoa I'm stressed
Basically the first thought I had.  The Singularity nuts are always talking about the (theoretical) construction of the computational equivalent of the human brain.  This is basically a way that goal can be approached.
Stop talking; there's science to do.
Thanks for reading with an open mind.  You're much cooler than Mr. Twig.  Edit: Any advice on being more understandable in the future? I only seem to have downmods waiting for me if I present a dissenting view.
&gt;strong Euro  Iran also accepts the gold dinar.
You're right. Recursion is totally obsolete because it is fundamentally incompatible with agile programming and rails-centric development.
Dear god that was like watching a car wreck.  Scroll down....cringe...scroll down...wince...
I really do want to believe him.  Really I do.  The problem is I just can't seem to shake the feeling of corporate overlord around this whole deal.  Sun used to be very cool, but now they just kinda scare me.  :/
Samsung's 'iPhone-Copier'?
No. Cut the sarcasm.
I was a bit skeptical myself.  Still am.  I know that a lot of people who go to a therapist and tell them that they have been abused (or suspect that they have been abused) in childhood are encouraged to 'remember' things that never, ever happened.  It even happens with people who go to a therapist with vague, free floating anxiety. I could go on and on about that, but the point is I think that's what might have happened to this girl with the whole rape/pregnancy/abortion thing at age 14. That is IF any of what they portrayed on that show was true at all.  In NO WAY is my comment mean to cast those who have been abused in a negative light, but not everyone who claims it is being truthful.
No, they don't want to kiss up to this culture. They want to deal with the threats that exist within countries with that culture in a *smart* way. As opposed to McCain who wants to deal with them in a *dumb* way.   However, to people that aren't smart enough to even grasp what Obama and others are trying to do, they simplify it to a level they can understand and just say they're trying to "kiss up" or "surrender."   It's one thing for people to disagree with Obama's policies, which I can respect, but most people are simply too dumb to understand, or too willfully ignorant to understand. Since you so gleefully misrepresent them, it's clear you're the latter.
We currently don't have much in the way of vocal work. Everyone switches up what they're doing. Sometimes someone will sing, sometimes not.  We've got a chaos pad, and a gasmask that has a mic mounted in it that I use sometimes for doing odd vocals over things.  I think that lyrics and melodies should be written seperately, and that it doesn't really matter what order they're written in.   So, we don't have a dedicated singer, but then again none of us are only doing one thing anyhow. 
modded you up, told my wife to do it and all of her family as well. I couldn't have said it better myself. 
Isn't this what haunted house attractions are all about in Catholic and evangelical churches?
i've been baking my own beer for years
Your mom is a zionist.
More completely ridiculous "emotional link" barbarity. The trend to downplay biological ties would inevitably end here:the so-called "superior interests" of the child can serve to justify kidnappings and all sorts of abusive behavior.  Someone should just steal the kids of the people who make this decisions and then argue the same.  Sorry if I'm not making much sense but this sort of shit revolts me to no end. My gut reaction is to think I would not shed a fucking tear if everyone involved in this decision got a bullet between the eyes. Fuck, I would chip in for the bullets.  I've seen people even use idiotic justifications like "ohh, but they are richer, the kid will be better off, surely they want the best for the child". FUCKING IDIOTS, I would **love** that some rich motherfucker would just take your kids away from you forever and see how **you** feel.  Were I'm at there have been recently several situations like this, and they are generally all coherent in the utter hypocrisy and stupidity: some couple takes in a kid without caring for any legalities and then some bunch of idiots come with the "attachment" arguments to justify removing their **real** parents from the equation. Generally the story is framed in  way to get public opinion  approval.  Recently an Argentinian women found out that her "parents" had pactuated with the regime who killed her real parents; they knew she had family looking for her and did nothing; she, after **32** years of considering those people her parents, put them on trial for complicity with murder. Now, this women has more balls then most men I know.  Here's hoping this kid does the same when he grows up (yes, the foster "parents" are equally guilty as the people who made the ruling).
Yeah, but what's with all the space in there? It usually seems pretty tight to me...
&gt;If a group of people all decide that someone should be allowed to kill themselves or have an abortion, I think it should be done regardless of what rules have been proclaimed by people outside that group  Well, according to you, the majority should always get its way. So if the majority wanted to compel women to have forced abortions, you'd be criticizing us if we criticized that, claiming we were trying to force minority opinions on everyone.
We should have seen this coming. [We had the right instinct](http://www.photobasement.com/home-or-street-corner/), but couldn't forsee the consequences. 
&gt;I'm just claiming that they provide very little information, not no information at all.  The problem is that polygraphs only work, if they can be said to work at all, on naive participants.  Someone who is aware of the usage of control (directed lie) questions as a means of establishing a baseline can make the polygraph indicate pretty much whatever they want.
&gt; like subversion, it's just that the DVCS and git's/mercurial's speed seem to work well with the way that I work.)  Then by all means use it; a similar argument could be made for any tool...svn included.
That means you save a lot of money. And you can donate a lot more :)
If that was his point then of course I agree.
While at Barnes &amp; Noble bookstore I helped point the [complete stranger to Ron Paul's new book for purchase](http://www.dailypaul.com/node/47576)
How long had they been selling Marlboro's on the island for?  As far as I've always known, whenever Philip Morris enters a new market with Marlboro, they try to duplicate the flavor of the highest-selling brand there, and then gradually adjust it to the real Marlboro flavor.
Hey, another retard has been doing that for 8 years, why not give it a shot?
It's not the point that it's old, it's that this has probably been submitted 5-6 times already.  I came in here just to say that.  Reddit is supposed to be *what's new online*, not what was new and been submitted already!
as if hot dogs werent bad enough by themselves
Find out that your seductress is only fifteen.  put *back on* Robe and Wizard Hat.  Leave the state   ???
Did you read the news/blog post they put up stemming from controversy about this exact issue?
&gt;They found it pretty much felt what you would think an animal being boiled alive would feel and that they didn't die that fast.  Link?  &gt;You remind me of the dark ages back when they thought animals didn't feel pain, when they would nail dogs to boards and dissect them, claiming they didn't feel pain.  You don't know me at all, and seem to have missed the point of that middle part of my comment. Oh well.
As usual Fox stoop to an even lower level but I wouldn't worry too much.  Only the dregs of society watch Fox anyway right?
no wonder he wanted to eliminate the income tax, he's going to have to pay a boatload after selling all those books!
I guess if it had been anybody else but the NYT, the media would've paid attention.
THE SINGULARITY IS NEAR I shall be migrating inward to the collective intelligence
&gt; I'm sick of people who reply to a comment with lots of points just so it can appear closer to the top of the page.  I hadn't thought of that.  Thanks for the new tactic!
Wow, this may very well be the most retarded "political comment" anyone has ever made. What's next? Obama not wearing.. OK, the second most.
I don't :(
I bought "The Revolution: A Manifesto" along with "Are We Rome?: The Fall of an Empire and the Fate of America" TP by Cullen Murphy.  Enjoy your downfall.
42! that's the answer.
Inflation does not help banks at all, it's their number 1 enemy, quite the opposite, it helps people who have loans (which is most of the US).  So in fact you have it exactly backward.  If you owe money inflation is excellent for you, but if you are a bank or a credit card company and loan money it's terrible.  So actually, for the average american inflation is good - most americans have a mortgage and/or credit card loans, and almost no savings, so they benefit plenty from inflation.  The government as a whole benefits as well (they owe plenty), so who looses? The banks, and the rich.
&gt; the more independent users you have, the more interesting Git becomes. Because everybody's working on their own pet features.  If you're the only person who works on and/or cares about the code, why do you need distributed VC?  Like I said, it doesn't make sense for ppl working on their pet project to use DVC.  If they're working on an experimental piece of a large software project, then maybe. Clearly, the majority of projects out there are one man shows.
We're paying more for gas because of the idiots who did not understand what 'adjustable' meant in adjustable rate mortgages.
Sylnt grn is ppl.
i would even if you dont.
PLT Scheme
The Minnesota bridge had under-speced parts. THe bridges were built 40 years ago. I'm pretty sure the war in Iraq didn't effect the underspecification 40 years ago.
This will happen every place where Islam is left to its own devices.  Ideally, Islam should be wiped out but that's not being realistic.  A religion that seeks to destroy that which it is to weak to control will probably self destruct anyway by eventually turning on itself.  In that regard I am more than happy letting nature take it's course.
Do you know if what you said is true for private student loans? I don't have any federal loans and the interest rates on my variable private loans have been dropping. I'm hoping that I can consolidate and lock in a low fixed rate, but from my research thus far not many places seem to like private loans. 
The world really bums me out sometimes.  My perfect world: 1.) The foster parents actively try get the incorrectly accused parents involved in the childs life, eventually giving up the baby. 2.) The state pays a huge settlement fee for one of the biggest stuff ups ever 3.) The case workers in this incident are found and prosecuted for gross negligence 4.) This legislation is investigated... Potentially changed, you know, going back to the principal of "innocent until proven guilty", or at the very least, "innocent until given fairly substantive proof". Anonymous tips don't count. Really, they don't.
No offense taken.  We're still trying to use abstinence-only in the majority of our schools, which doesn't even seem to do *anything*.  Still, how is their solution to "these kids are scared what they're doing might be illegal" to make it *more* illegal?  That's friggen backwards.
Latest: American tourists thought to be victims  http://reddit.com/info/6hqdn/comments/  http://www.news.com.au/dailytelegraph/story/0,22049,23627302-5001021,00.html
His ideas on many subjects are not written about in the Constitution, so he's gotten his ideas from someplace. I'd recommend reading this new book of his. At the end, he has provided a reading list of books that he said has influenced his thoughts.
Is that a no?
How about they go after you for price gouging your employer.  You could probably still live and eat if you were paid $1 less per hour.
BUT WHERE WERE THEY WHEN MY KID WAS FUCKING ABUSED?!?!?!?!
yeah i tried that but i really only have an idea of what it was saying not exactly how it said it.  All i remember is that reporters weren't going to ask certain questions because they didn't want to be cut off from getting the information.  its going to drive me insane trying to figure it out but oh well. Thanks for the responses, i appreciate reddit at least trying for me.
You don't have the authority nor ability to tell me what to do.
and it is working.  Look at the numbers of hybrid vehicles on the road now compared to then.   Not everyone is going yet, but many more are.
i'm sorry, but i think this is such a naive argument. talk to any girl/women in confidence; they want sexual pleasure in the same percentages that boys/men do. but women will always be more concerned about the ramifications of sexual intercourse than men; they have to carry the potential result inside of their womb. so they seek some sort of justification for the risk they take; be it security or short-term gain, or even just social reward. not to mention the social fallout that the author talks about; if a girl has sex outside of a commitment, more often than not she is criticized harshly for it.  alternatively, the popular perception is that a man who has sex outside of commitment is a maverick. but the reality is that he only had that sex to stroke his ego/bolster his social status. if you think he has sex to fulfill some uncontrollable sexual desire, wouldn't it have been a hell of a lot quicker and easier to jerk off and get back playing madden 08?  the kind of women who care about more than money, power and empty charms do want sex; they just don't want it with people who only care about sex, and/or think they're above developing a relationship.
Clearly, and I say, clearly, you have not been to Saudi Arabia and Dubai.  Fair enough, comparing Canada to the US is not the same, but comparing Saudi Arabia to Dubai has a lot more similarities.
I call bullshit on the attached story.  In the video, they said, "Our water bill's going to be huge."  That doesn't make sense, given the context.
This reminds me of this latent fear I have when I go to meet somebody at the airport -- my brother, my wife -- that I'm not going to recognize them.  Toss in seeing somebody out of context, and a focus on the case rather than the model...  Wow, that was awesome.  *Edit to add*: Not just the contestant, but the mom too, it seems.  Very nice.
I suggest "Are We Rome?: The Fall of an Empire and the Fate of America" TP by Cullen Murphy.  Excellent addition to the reading list that includes "Blowback", "The Sorrows of Empire" and "Imperial Hubris".
What a savage. I like how people in backwards cultures actually try to explain away their stupidity with statements like this; they carry an attitude that basically says, "We're just different and have the right to be."
I thought that it had this feature actually, and that it disappeared.  I could just have a bad memory though.
Gimmicks like this always have shitty specs compared to a quality product
I upmodded the submission just to piss off people like you who hate me for stupid reasons. Well, that wasn't the only reason. I didn't know he had a book out, so it got my upmod for that too.
I don't think it's splitting hairs.  Even assuming Hagee and Wright are equal, McCain doesn't know and isn't really associated with Hagee.  Obama attended Wright's church for 20 years, brought his children up in that church, names his books after Wrights sermons, called him a spiritual mentor, and gave him $50,000 in the last three years, after the youtube speeches happened.  Not splitting hairs at all.
If by kissing up you mean attempting to broker peace and stability on this planet, then I can't wait to see Obama pucker up those big ol' lips of his (NON-RACIST COMMENT).  How long has fear controlled your life?
Wait, was that $360 billion in US dollars?  So that's like, what, €50 these days?
Never tried it myself, but was referred to it by the [Privacy Rights Clearinghouse](http://www.privacyrights.org/fs/fs4-junk.htm#getofflist)
Title: "Man accused of trying to cash check for $360,000,000,000"  Should be self explanatory.
I await the golden twinkie that ends that fat sack of human excrement's plague on humanity. 
Forget Sex, check out ["a"](http://www.google.com/trends?q=beatles%2C+jesus%2C+sex%2C+harry+potter%2C+a&amp;ctab=0&amp;geo=all&amp;date=all&amp;sort=0).
Now that Ubuntu has addressed my hardware needs with Hardy, I run my workstatins using it. Would you define this as hitting a wall?
Who asked for war?
A parent complains about another parent but anonymous tips are taken more seriously. Lovely.
Makes me feel like i'm Crash Bandicoot.
lets talk about this common misspelling. So common its almost acceptable. College professors make it, stupid bitches make it. Its everywhere. Some linguistic somewhere please come up with a cure for loose spelling.
&gt;Colleges are te ones pushing EVERYONE to go.  Actually, no. It's demand that pushes them. Everyone is so quick to criticize the American universities, when they don't even realize the European Union is Reforming their higher education system based on the success of America's. Read the links below. One is from the Chancellor of Oxford University.  [Economist](http://forum.armenianclub.com/showthread.php?t=6222)  [Oxford Chancellor](http://www.independent.co.uk/news/education/higher/should-european-universities-follow-americas-lead-417746.html)
Yeah it would be silly for her to run as an independent seeing as her positions are identical to Obama's (only difference is rhetorical style). I mean with nader, he isn't really a spoiler because he is an actual candidate with views different than all of the others candidates. But with Hillary running, you would have two identical candidates, her and obama, and thus classic vote splitting.
It's not JEWS, you rabid antisemitic fuck, it's ZIONISTS.
Let's call them HP.
Big fucking woop?
It should have been called flux capacitor, because that's what it is.
Ah; thank you.  I knew there must be something I wasn't thinking of.
"Hardly any?" One is enough, if Hamas wants to keep firing and killing Israelis, you can expect the Israeli army to go after them. Lets say I killed your mother by firing a gun in a random direction miles away, wouldn't you expect there to be some consequenses for me? And when Hezbollah attacked they killed several soldiers and kidnapped two. And on top of that started firing rockets on neighboring towns, how do you not expect retaliation. And don't take Israel's word for it, many Human Rights groups condemned Hamas for exactly that. And there are documented cases of Palestinians kicking Hamas out of their neighborhoods so they wouldn't shoot rockets because they knew the Israeli response.
And somehow the only people those "terrorists" have killed is Iraqies.  It's a shite vs suni war (the same war as Iraq vs Iran), America is caught in the middle, but america didn't create it. We could leave because it's nothing to do with us, but if we do they will wipe each other out. Is that good or bad? You decide.  What america did do was remove a ruthless dictator who killed anyone who caused problems. Kill all those people, and I suppose things seem pretty quiet when all the trouble makers are dead.
I've been trying to come to terms with this too.  Chua says that you should think of a circuit in terms of charge (q) and flux (φ = ∫Vdt), instead of current (I = dq/dt) and voltage (V).  Under these conditions:  Capacitor: V = (1/C)∫Idt --&gt; dφ/dt = (q/C) --&gt; φ = (1/C)∫qdt  Resistor: V = IR --&gt; dφ/dt = Rdq/dt --&gt; φ = Rq  Inductor: V = LdI/dt --&gt; dφ/dt = Ld²q/dt² --&gt; φ = Ldq/dt  So where does this next element fit?  Maybe make flux proportional to the double integral of charge?  Or to the second derivative of charge? That will give the following:  φ = kd²q/dt² --&gt; V = kd²I/dt²  φ = k∫(∫qdt)dt' --&gt; V = k∫(∫Idt)dt'  The second one seems to have a memory of the current that's passed through it, kind of like a memristor, but I don't see what makes it more fundamental than the other option.  And why can't you apply the same reasoning to triple integrals and third derivatives, and further still?  Edit: replaced φ = dV/dt by φ = ∫Vdt
Yeah... I played the original Halo for 40 hours straight on launch.  On another note:  is the webcam broken for anyone else?
I thought the article was gonna read "Hey, Zuckerberg!  Sell your damn company for billions before companies realize it really isn't worth that much.  Then never work a day for the rest of your life"
You may want to look into Firefox and AdBlock.  I haven't seen an ad in years.
Haskell  D, Eiffel, Clean and F# would also be fun to learn.
actually, yes it is the cost of crude. Thats how supply and demand works. Weekends and the summer are when demand is the highest. When demand goes up and supply remains the same, that causes prices to rise.  Oil executives didn't arbitrarily choose weekends and summer to raise prices.
Sure, but judging your comment history, it appears you're hostile with a sarcastic comment. GTFO, like you care.
I guess you could fall into the rock wall.
If CPS comes near your house, shut the door, lock it, don't talk to them, and call a lawyer.  Send them to a private school if you can afford it.  DON'T SIGN ANYTHING no matter what they say!
It's visibly worse I agree. But actually worse? I'm not so sure - it was all hidden before, but just as bad.
Damn underage geriophiles, there oughtta be a law..
I'm not sure I understand why someone hasn't challenged family court rulings on constitutional grounds. Anyone have a clue?
If you really like this show, support it by buying the DVDs from Discovery... because it will mean more like it.  You may be indirectly responsible for some kid accepting Evolution and discounting ID! Its important!
You should have tried for some butte-sex.
Whoa whoa whoa. Hold it right there.  Obama says he will recall the troops with conditions pending.  Obama says he will continue the offensive in Afghanistan.  Obama wants to increase the military by an additional 10%, another 97,000 units.  Obama wants to keep us in continual war and kept voting for it.  Obama wants to do all this while our budget is fucked up, hint at universal healthcare, decrease taxes and increase tax credits.
not voltage, but magnetic flux: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Memristor
Was posted and buried here earlier http://reddit.com/info/6hna5/comments/
&gt;you're likely to meet workers who spent years and their family's life savings on college, only to end up with a job they could have done as a high-school dropout.  Well, they could do the work, but they wouldn't be offered the job without the piece of paper.
They paid their money and received a product?  Is that what stores who sold tainted Tylenol should have thought and acted like?  Why the fuck look for other poison pills.  After all, those who purchased them got something physical to take home - we don't know what they got, but who the fuck cares what it might have really been. So, saying you are going to make sure there aren't other problems is Confirming suspicions? Huh?  What the fuck?  You don't seem to understand that words have meanings that go with them, and they are not just catch all bullshit holders.  Of course, in your world, so full of bullshit, it's really not a wonder why you are confused. 
Also negotiable: the application of the  "shock the conscience" test.  The court subjectively finds something superduper shocking the first time, but only super shocking the second time; only somewhat surprising the third time, and tiresome the fourth.
www.philipweiss.org  In order to understand why she would do this, you need to understand just who is still supporting Hillary, and where her money is coming from.  The truth is she is the preferred candidate for Zionist traitors in our country, especially the rich ones.  Philip Weiss covers a lot of these issues and I encourage you to check his words out.  www.philipweiss.org  ZERO TOLERANCE for ZIONISTS! They hate America.  ZTZ  ZERO TOLERANCE for ZIONISTS! They hate Democracy.  Zionists are to blame for Iraq, and will be to blame for Iran if we do anything to Iran. Remember what Hillary said the day of the heavily-Zionist Pennsylvania Primary? That she would DESTROY Iran!  Her loyalty is not to us.  Where did Mark Penn spend years polishing his craft?  Israel.  www.philipweiss.org -- look in the archives and topics.  Seriously, take a look!
It's a black dude, right? I thought it was some kind of mask or maybe that thing that killed my father.... Regardless, when I did see it, it actually gave me the chills. Weird.
Parties are silly and always will be.
So we saw reddit in action earlier, giving flowers to that reporter. What's the exact opposite of giving flowers? (aside from stealing this guys flowers, I guess)
A real man would caulk his wagon and ford the river.
&gt; why ought it be considered a "basic component" along with the resistor, cap, and inductor?  When you analyse an electrical circuit mathematically, breaking down all the components into the smallest possible pieces, everything is made up of three electrical elements:  - the resistor, which produces a voltage proportional to the current flowing through it - the capacitor, which produces a current proportional to the rate of change of voltage across it - the inductor, which produces a voltage proportional to the rate of change of current through it  This is all we need for any circuit we can build today. The memristor changes this; as it is a new element which *cannot* be defined in terms of a resistor, capacitor or inductor, it opens up a whole new set of possibilities for circuit design. This is why this is such an important invention.
Sad baby stories get me as well. If someone took my babies away I think I might go certifiably insane. I feel so sorry for the mother, especially. Nevermind her emotional connection to her child, but at three weeks post-partum her whole physical being is attached to that infant.  And now the child is 3! And those poor parents have missed so much of their baby growing up. This is just disgusting.
&gt;I regularly hand pet squirrels, raccoons, and chipmunks while feeding them. Anybody who lives around raccoons can confirm this, but if you approach a raccoon on all fours, and sway from side to side gently, keeping your teeth covered and your eyes averted, it'll let you shag it up the bum.
Asbury Park, NJ.
McCain is toast. The Evangelicals will not turn out for him. No Rupublican can win without the Evangelicals. And the top poster is right. Hilarity will ensue from the debates...
What are you waiting for? I expect a video of you kicking down there door and yelling, "The internet tough guy is here!" Should be awesome.
That's a pretty hefty umbilical cord and foreskin!
At least he didn't say the space shuttle was being used to try to assassinate the president via earthquake.
agreed, but sometimes, change will not come from within. I know you can't force democracy onn people who don't want it (I think Jefferson said something about that), but this is all just craziness... and not the good kind.
Yeah, I would invest heavily in alternate identities in another country. Fucking assholes.
one is enough?  I guess Hammas is justified too, because the IDF have killed hundreds of civilians versus Hammas... which has killed like tens of civilians if even that.  I like how you have completely bought into the propoganda, I guess it takes a special kind of twisted mentality to accept the death of hundreds of innocent people just in case 2 or 3 people might or might not die.  The worst Hammas has ever done is respond to Israels attacks, if you recall the people who started it all was Israel, the founding thereof no less. You don't just take away peoples land and expect them to sit down and say 'ok'. Ironically that's what the palestinians did, though that wasn't good enough and now they have to give up their entire land.
Aren't these the same rules you use for any multiple choice timed test?
Apologies in advance if you're mentally retarded, but, on the off chance that you're just stupid, IRAQ HAD NOTHING TO DO WITH 9/11, YOU IGNORANT BASTARD. Thanks.
What - did they know each other ? 
You know, maybe it's just because I'm a pedant, but he's right, isn't he?  "Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel and unusual punishments inflicted."  Torture is certainly cruel and unusual, but it isn't punishment.  He's right in saying that just because he doesn't like something doesn't make it unconstitutional.
D&amp;D has a *lot* more problems than their website sucking.  Wizards of the Coast turned D&amp;D into a piece of over-priced crap. For the cost of all the manuals and materials needed to run a decent campaign, I could invest in a computer game that does all the work for me.  D&amp;D nowadays is pretty much a computer game run on pencil and paper.
Fox News, and I hate to say this, was often covering Paul when other networks weren't.
Obviously, torture of detainees by interrogators is PUNISHMENT for non-compliance.  Q: "Tell us what you know!" A: "No." Q: "Do you want to get waterboarded?"  Did Scalia study under Alberto Gonzales, or did he just suffer a massive head injury as a child? Leslie Stahl should have laughed in his fat stupid face!
I'm sold!
Are there two small teleprompter screens on the surface of the podium? What are those two rectangles?
Twitter?
